This is a failure for Google. Shame on you, Google.
you made an excellent choice not buying a home in arizona
I cannot believe how much this made me laugh. 
Say... how did you get to be a doctor, anyway?
You mention you fit the collar snug which could be part of your problem. You should allow for two fingers to fit easily between her neck and the collar. If it's too snug there is no give if it gets caught on something.   There are several on eBay. You might want to send the seller a message asking if they would consider a quantity discount.  Suggest you talk to your neighbors and let them know she's not a stray if they should see her. 
Was I the only one expecting a Sara Jessica Parker punchline?
I'm in LA!  That is...Louisiana ;)  
Not only do I record both values, I keep a digital copy of the receipt!  I've never heard of anyone else doing this, though so I'm pretty sure I'm very paranoid in this regard.  Over the course of the 8 years or so since I've been tracking I've probably noticed a difference of $50 bucks or so total.  So no, I don't generally go back and complain.  But at the point a business feels they need to try and scrape every last dollar from me I just stop giving them my money and there have been several instances of that.
He keeps making them up, he keeps getting downvoted. One day, he might win.
why not just put a stool on a 1/5 scale rc car.
Her profile points to this: http://www.okcupid.com:900/profile/Made_a_mistake  lulz.
http://www.dogbreedinfo.com/images15/IrishWolfhoundFrankBrendan.JPG
Many people make the error thinking that a "monopoly" is defined in the dictionary and not by law. A "monopoly" is NOT where *one* business gets ALL the market. A *legal* monopoly is one in which one player enjoys the vast majority of sales in a market, and whatever competition there is isn't enough to affect the player's behavior. For example, Microsoft doesn't have a "dictionary" monopoly but a *legal* monopoly.  &gt;"Microsoft enjoys so much power in the market for Intel-compatible PC operating systems that if it wished to exercise this power solely in terms of price, it could charge a price for Windows substantially above that which could be charged in a competitive market," (Judge) Jackson wrote.  &gt;"Moreover, it could do so for a significant period of time without losing Microsoft's day in court an unacceptable amount of business to competitors," he added. "In other words, Microsoft enjoys monopoly power in the relevant market."  ref: http://news.cnet.com/2100-1040-232565.html  Similarly, Comcast could double the price of its high speed internet, and while some customers would simply drop their service, they have no other high speed broadband provider to switch to.  This is the *legal definition* of a monopoly.
Is this not a breach of contract?  Trac Phone says, this phone must be used only on Trac networks, by purchasing this phone you agree to this term.
If you can be a Pathologist's Assistant- do it. You will make as much money and work much, much less ( I work less than 4 hours per day, scheduled hours, and never on call).  The only problem is that there are only 8 universities in the U.S. offering degrees as Pathologist's Assistant, and they are very competitive.  The Physician's Assistant is a good alternative though, that was my goal before the Pathologist's Assistant thing basically fell in my lap.
Do you change your friends regularly?  Can't see many of them staying friends once they realise you're a cocktease
This is absolutely brilliant. Great job, there's a lot of story in that shot.
That's my mail dammit! Didn't you know it is a federal crime to open someone else's mail?
&gt;How is it in the public interest to know that the US ambassador to Belgium thinks that the Belgian foreign minister is an ass, or that Jordan doesn't like Iran  Likewise, why is any of that confidential?
Yeah, they're pretty awesome.  
how many chat channels can a person have? could we  /join redditwarlock /join redditpaladin /join redditpriest etc?
&gt;under the topic of graphics are expensive: most AAA titles are now asking for $60 instead of the $50 that we have been paying for decades. the thing is they ask for more money, i feel entitled to a better product not a rehash. Have you ever heard of inflation?  The fact that games were $50 for "decades" means that in real terms they were getting cheaper every year.  So just consider what they would have cost compared to today and $60 is nothing(not that I ever pay $60 because I buy on deep sales).  Read more about inflation [here](http://allfinancialmatters.com/2009/09/21/the-history-of-inflation/).
If you're after a quieter (yet still largish) city and geology is your thing, then either Perth or Brisbane would probably suit.  But... our politics are completely idiotic. Don't get me wrong, Australia ranks extremely well on corruption scales, and our electoral system is comparably superb (e.g. compared to the US and the gerrymandering that goes on there), it's just that our politicians act like children continuously, and seemingly try to point score rather than do anything useful.
There is only one thing that one should truly value in their life: happiness. Everything that is not happiness is suffering. But there is certainly a balance to be attained in terms of short and long term happiness. That is what makes life, life.  /Buddhist
I shoot my mail open, Homer Simpson style.
Finally, a definitive "Deactivate Firebug for this website"
Reddit's still nicer than any other community I interact with regularly.
The old men didn't mess with them while they were trying to play one of their games.  I say score one for the old farts.
EDIT: Comment Removed.
I'm hoping for one of two things: * Rapture. All the religious people ascend into heaven. Everyone else is left behind to run the planet in peace. * Zombie apocalypse.  Last I checked, the Warhammer 40K MMO is projected to release in fourth quarter 2012. It may be so good that it ends the planet. 
Thanks for that.  :(
Read your own link.
I've been a DJ for five years now. I'm from belgium. Every promomix I put only gets loads of very positive responses from other promoters &amp; DJ's in belgium. I'm also one of the few here that mixes with 3 decks (3x technics or 2x technics 1 CDJ). Lots of ppl have compared my skills with famous DJ's. I've played at a few big events in Belgium. But I don't get booked very often. Lots of ppl in the scene get way more bookings than I do, and the skill of some of those ppl is just laughable. I don't understand why I do not get more bookings. Do you have any tips in that regard?   TY
I bet she can go on chatroulette just as well. Or 4chan.
feeling pretty shitty right now. I'm sorry
shine light through a prism and onto the smoke
If you shifted your weight to either side wouldn't you slip through with one foot and kick yourself in the ass with the other.. 
Crooked smile and head.  Your hands make me want not else.  Lace leaves me thoughtless.
As I said no one knows. Meaning she doesn't either. Its one of those "here, idk what these are" kind of things. 
FWIW I upvoted you. It's true - just by the literal words of the Gospels there is no indication that either genealogy is anything besides Jesus' genealogy via Joseph.
[](/yey)
And thus, terrorists were born.
I see what you're saying, but what do I get out of this receipt? I know that he ate there on 10/30 at around 8pm, but so did everyone else eating in the restaurant. They probably even saw what he was eating and got to see him stuff his face with it. The only thing I, and the rest of us, are getting out of this is his grasp on math. Not private.   Again, I know what you're saying, but this isn't a document showing what he purchased. Sure, maybe I'd start to question why all my receipts were posted on the internet where everyone got to see what I was buying and such, but we can't see that (again, anyone in the store would see what I'm buying anyhow). We can only see a butchered addition problem.
Many many hours of my early teenage years were spent playing this game, or reading that manual... Almost went into the airforce 
the god damn startcraft tournament around halloween
True. But it's extremely unlikely. To have the key, would probably require having an ultra-high-level-status in the WL organization, which would mean that the insurance protects them as well. The same goes for *knowing* that you "wouldn't be harmed" by the leak, which implies detailed knowledge of the contents.  Besides, it is likely that the key itself is protected. So, Assange could very well have the *only* key. It could even have a setup like "Lost"...if he doesn't log in with his personal key to reset the countdown timer every "X" number of days, the system goes public with the document key.  Oh yeah, for all intents and purposes, it is *impossible* to brute-force this type of encryption too.
That guy looks like Walshy.
[The Espionage Act](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/11/29/AR2010112905973.html?hpid=topnews)
&gt;The only time I don't fail is when I don't try.  Strongly disagree on this one. Not trying is the surest way to failure. It's pretty much accepting failure before you even allow yourself a fighting chance. Don't do that. That's beta behavior. And it's only hurting your game.  I remember going to bars and seeing so many amazing looking women, and not talking to any of them, and then going home that night feeling like the biggest failure. I felt like a loser, a nobody, a "fag". It totally gets you into a downward spiral. The more you don't try, the more you feel like you fail, so you avoid trying at all, and always fail. Its a vicious cycle that's been talked about on this subreddit numerous times. But you need to **KEEP TRYING**, and **KEEP FAILING**. The key to this stuff is to figure out **WHY YOU'RE FAILING AND HOW YOU CAN FIX IT.** Its **Trial and Error**. There are no magic bullets here. Just useful info that you need to calibrate into your own lifestyle. I can safely assume most sedditors, including myself, have done this as well. Now I have no problem talking to those women and bringing them back to my apartment for sex.  All sedditors have failed and continue to fail every now and then. But we learn from out failures. We post them up here **proudly** for all to see and scrutinize. We gain feedback from each other, similar stories, and the occasional "splash of cold water in the face" ("what the fuck were you thinking?")  It's a constant learning game. I've been learning this stuff since late high school. I'm 26 now. No way do I consider myself a "PUA". But compared to the person I once was, "PUA" is an understatement. I'm a whole new person.  Keep posting on seddit. Go out and give us some field reports. You'll see how accepting this community is to your failures and how much we want to help you. Because we were all at that point once before. Good luck to you.  KEEP TRYING. MAKE MISTAKES. FAIL. LEARN. LIVE LIFE. HAVE FUN.
Probably, yes. 
Actually, it's all culture. Go derp in a commune, faggot.
common, but that doesn't make it any less beautiful. Just like the stars in the sky. 
The genes are the parts that make up the design. At risk of oversimplifying, I'll use this example.  Robot 1 has a gene for 4 wheels. Robot 2 has a gene for 6 wheels.  Robot 2 performs better.  Robot 2's genes, and therefore the six wheeled gene, get passed on.  There may be a random mutation that leads to 8 wheels, which may perform better than 6 wheels, but it may be worse in which case it would die out and 6 wheels would continue on until another random mutation superseded it (or didn't).
Third answer: [there are two Gorillazes](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0HalCyn7z74).
it's that thing that let you post the comment you just did without getting imprisoned or killed.
I have a friend that works for a defense contractor and make i dunno high $80k maybe ... but his wife of 2 years has yet to complete university -- money can be tough to share.  Just try to think things through. In my opinion relationships should try to be 50/50. Just because you marry doesn't mean that 1 person should create 99% of the useable income in the house. But then my friend's situation is probably much different than your own.
I've never wrestled Greco.  I learned to be incredibly aggressive and dangerous on bottom, i actually pinned several decent wrestlers within a few seconds of starting the round on the bottom, so i hate the stalling on bottom.  Locking hands i don't really like, but i don't really care.  It doesn't actually change things a hell of a lot in most situations, just slows some stuff down a little.  The points for throws would have served me well, especially since i did a number of suplexes and bear hugs as i got better, but they were potent enough without getting extra points.  I don't think i ever suplexed anyone without pinning them shortly afterward.
Where're you seeing them? I went to see them in Prague last month- best gig I've ever been to :) May have to go continental to see them next time too since they seem not to be playing in the UK
you shoulda seen how butchered it was before i hit save
I was US Army, and I would. The Army is a microcosm of society, anyone you know, theres a similar person with a gun.
FYI, the submitter of this to the DailyPaul is a gold and silver freak. He is constantly pushing buying these metals, which seems to coincidentally go along with all the metals advertisers on the DailyPaul.. Interesting, no?
I was informed in r/seduction just today that women can't lead... ever. Does that count?
1) He hasn't been punished yet.  Heck, he hasn't even been tried yet.  2) It isn't clear to me that he did break the law.
Michigan!  I'm kind of blown away myself.  Totally sweet couple, and they said they would have no problem providing me with more than 2 oz per month at that price.  They even asked what I wanted them to grow for me.  Like, name it and we'll get it.
That image makes more sense.  I have a $50 reflex dot. I know that it lasers the glass directly. It goes kinda like [the middle eye](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_dot_sights).  I can understand how that could show a bit of laser forward.
Honestly, as unusual as this is to hear from a noted skeptic such as myself, I've had only positive personal experiences from chiropractors. I visited the same chiropractor over a period of several years. The man had an accredited medical degree, and never once pitched anything pseudo-scientific such as chi, energy, or life force.  There were quantitative tests done to measure the muscular activity supporting my spine in a clear and obvious way (the results were freely shared with me, and made complete medical sense), and I was informed of the limitations of the practice, that chiropractics was not a cure-all, but only useful for spinal-centered injuries. I personally had an old injury to my neck as a child that had caused it to form with an improper curve (slightly convex instead of concave), which led to chronic pain and limited motor function in my neck.   After sustained treatment with the chiropractor, I began to notice marked improvement, and the before-and-after x-rays show quite obvious change in the curvature of my neck, which goes a long way to remove any possible placebo affect.  I've applied all my skeptic-senses to this thing and, honestly, I haven't found anything shady about it, at least from MY experience. Perhaps there are those out there who are full of pseudo-scientific crap,  but I can personally attest that there is at very least ONE who is a legitimate medical professional.  If anyone has any thoughts or insights that I may have forgotten, I'd love to hear them.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Castle_doctrine#Adoption_by_States
We had this printed on the wall on my high school gym
I can't do it either. I had 3 other people tripping balls and I just sat there going :/.  They said I had it right too. I just felt light headed.
&gt;kanye was a successful producer before he was a *sucessful* rapper  ftfy
Criticism of surveillance state? TOTALLY LIKE BANKSY!   No.
I believe the Church as an institution has the right to oppose gay marriage if they believe that it harms the moral fabric of society.  I, as a person, don't have too much problem with gay marriage, but that mostly comes from my libertarian leanings and my friendship with a lady who is in a same-sex marriage and has two well-rounded children.
As long as it was an accurate assessment of their services, I say leave it up
Idra isn't scary as long as you bring a bit of cheese.
&gt;6 months  The divorce will probably cost him more than 10k...
Now, I'm no where near ready to jump on the 'good, this traitor got what he deserves' bandwagon... hell I'm not even a US citizen; but if you're going to leak state secrets you'd better be damn good at covering your ass.
Capitalization is the writing of a word with its first letter as an upper case and the remaining letters in lower case, in those writing systems which have a case distinction like English. It is taught in our Public school system, but that might change if all our local school boards loss the 17% of their funding that they receive form Department of Education.
 Agents are expecting to take a verity of workloads every now and again.  As you can see some people are just gushing with appreciation for their hard work these men  &amp; women do everyday.
Yeah, but in real life people tend to be a *lot* nicer and much less condencending. 
Not only is it a word. It's half of a [genre](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fidget_house). I definitely agree with you there regarding the clipped up vocals. They're so nice. I absolutely adore the way the melody drops at 1:20 as well. For me it starts to go a bit pear shaped at exactly the 2:45 mark!
On universal healthcare, the intention was for insurance lobbyists to put something in their pipes and smoke it. That arguably backfired when "mandatory" became an acceptable substitute for "universal", but here I'm not judging beliefs so much as their consistency.
One mans trash is another mans treasure. I think I see my future x wife... BRB fap fapfapy.
Yes exactly, [here](http://www.google.com/images?client=ubuntu&amp;channel=fs&amp;q=williams+syndrome&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=571) is what people with Williams syndrome generally look like, not her.
&gt;yeah i haven't heard anything by ortiz that made me want to hear more  125 grams part 1-4 anything from slaughterhouse
It's nice to see you have a soul. Not that i assumed otherwise.
5am is enough time to sleep before it.  I couldn't stand it starting at 2 or 3AM, that'd be the worst.
I wouldn't worry.  You see the little :&gt;) at the bottom? That means no worries.
it's fucking terrible. add my steam ID 2nafish I'll help ya out and i'm a pro player (lol)  Seriously though the community is full of retarded players...lose first round, rage quit game seems to be common procedure.
[Reminds me of this NSFW powerlifter picture.](http://forum.bodybuilding.com/attachment.php?attachmentid=104811&amp;d=1085628055)
So true.
Nice! I have both songs on my iPod and when ever one of 'em came on I would get deja vu, this explains it. 
well the thing about krav maga you have to worry about is how fast it happenes, drunken boxing is a very good art to learn as well, the best thing is that it doesn't have the same weakness that krav maga has, and that weakness i
Here's a question...is Nathan Fillion an atheist? 
"I am an atheist because I lack belief in gods. I was born lacking belief in gods."
All along the watchtower...
Chillwave indie-pop?  Idk, some co-workers just said it would probably appeal to the hippy crowd too.  Psychedelic stuff.  DJ equipment + live instruments.  I make all the music with loop pedals and stuff.  http://magicks.bandcamp.com
All religion is can be summed up as Repression. Some humans telling us their god wants us all to repress our natural feelings and Obey them - and give their god your money...
Thanks WastedTruth! I'm not sure if that's the word I found years ago, but it doesn't really matter. "Knothole" is a perfectly cromulent word for my purposes.  
Some of us actually like Windows ;)  Honestly, I'd be much more inclined to buy an iPod if I didn't have to use iTunes. That was my number one reason for not buying an iPod.  I express concern with my money, since Apple won't let us do it by using a different software.
Certainly, banks should not be in the business of enabling financial incompetence but neither should they be allowed to profit for that long from the same.  They may not be in the business of educating their customers but I don't see why we should allow them to be raging Mr. Potters.
True port is addictive for a lot of people. It may help you to relax somewhat but every drug has a downside. I would approach it from a cost/benefit analysis perspective.
Well it's not really "Thai curry" if you just put whatever you want in it. 
Nihilistic
Was going to say this.   He shouldn't get hung up on assumptions about what RPGs must have. There's always a counterexample. He should just write rules that facilitate the desired experiences.  Use existing games as inspiration, not as constraints.
&gt; It makes sense that you would have to prove your worth before you can even risk damaging a real (premium) vehicle on the track.  No it doesn't! If I've proved myself time and time again between GT1, GT2, GT4, Forza 1, Forza 2, and Forza 3, why the hell do I need to subject myself to some sort of grind-tastic gauntlet before I can have realistic damage?  Just set it as a difficulty option like Forza does. If I want to play with real damage at an early level, let me! I paid $300 for the stupid console and another $60 for the game. Don't make me jump through hoops in order to get all the cool features that caused me to buy a whole console just for one game.
You might check the SCUMM Bar.
Will the average user know/care enough to consider that?
I came here to say that I came here to say this...
Word has multiple meanings in common usage. Your constitution is irrelevant to the context this word is being used in.
You have to add the words into the dictionary. If you highlight an unknown word, hitting the Swype button will add the word into the dictionary. 
Not quite as easy as a fudge round cut in half but close.
Yes?
I think you're just taking things just a bit too seriously DONTCHA THINK?
Hey man,  I'm French but I live in the UK (Scotland). Yup, I'm under the snow!  Yes a lot of what you say makes sense. I think what bugs me the most about capitalism, regulation or not, is the *fabrication* of demand, through marketing. I have resolved to live my life free of advertising. So although I do own a telly for video gaming it is not cabled or antenna'ed, so I do not watch the tv. I do pay the license fee though simply because I watch BBC programs on the IPlayer. Only ads I end up seeing are in the paper (Guardian or Independent) and on the internet, and then it feels like an insult to me than anything else - someone trying to convince me I absolutely need something I absolutely do not require. We need to find a way to tame the current system of marketing that is out there - especially ads that assault our kids.   I think social democracy is a good way forward.   You mention the patenting system, which needs, absolutely needs, to be revised. It is halting progress, not aiding it, in its current form. How we can find a balance though I do not know.   You also mention stability, and it does seem that in a globalised economy social democracy seems destined to fail... which is why I'm convinced we need to reintroduce strict import tariffs.   It's absurd that the Spaniards import tomatoes from Morocco for their own consumption and produce tons and tons of them for export to France and Britain (and the rest of Europe - and I wouldn't be surprised if you could find them in Japan Oo). It's totally absurd!! I come from Brittany and my Mum's town is a fishing town, mainly sardines, and they have canning factories there. Today, the sardines which are canned are driven all the way up from Morocco too in refrigerated vans, cause it's cheaper than paying fishermen decent wages. WTF? It makes economic sense, but makes no sense at all otherwise.  The lack of tariffs is why we have to subsidise European (mostly French, the English rant) agriculture to keep it alive. If we don't it dies. But if we impose import tariffs, our production makes sense and subsidies decrease if not disappear. We can eliminate tariffs when a country has decided to play on an equal footing. I know it sounds harsh, but I see no other way.   International trade needs to make sense. If your country cannot produce tomatoes (such as in the UK) then don't eat tomatoes, or be willing to pay a decent price for them. In scotland all my friends who grew up here say that 15 years ago, tomatoes were a luxury.   Concerning the financing of research programs, yes public funding must, absolutely must continue, and increase. Not just for energy, but for medicine (no-one seems to give a crap about tropical diseases because it wouldn't be profitable), physics, climatology, cosmology, etc. Science should be central to our World-views, regardless of profit. Otherwise, what is the point to all this?  One last point before I sign off: the way I see wealth. To me wealth and property is not really something that is *mine*. Simply because I will die one day and it's not coming with me. No matter your idea about death (I am an atheist, but works for religious/spiritual folk too). So I *borrow* wealth for a time, I work for it and in exchange get the means to life and pursue knowledge and happiness, but that is all it is. It is meant to be exchanged or spent on meaningful things, not hoarded up in huge sums, or spent with the sole purpose of making more, and more, and more. I think that is an abuse of the concept.  Cheers!
jeebus, that sounds like hell...
me lazy. drink more. glug glug glug
Go on.
we have the before ... how about the after ...
I know they don't follow the 24 block rule for general spawns - well, more like the reverse.  You have to be within a certain distance for them to work (16 or 20, perhaps 24, blocks).  My collection point is well within this distance, something like 12 blocks away from the spawner.  The issue is that the spawner works at first, then stops producing more skeletons after like 10 min.  I haven't moved from the collection point in this time.
Where can I learn more history about programming languages? Maybe like a video series or something would be nice. I already know how to program some of them, I just would like to know more history. (Wikipedia is boring, college isn't an option)
Damn it... You totally nailed everything that's wrong. Oh, except one more thing. **It's missing a fucking NHL team**
Goto r/trees
&gt; That's the line that shouldn't be crossed - ugg boots are fine, AT HOME. :-)  Agreed! We have had bad snow recently. It's quite amusing watching people hop delicately on freezing cold toes after going out in deep snow in Uggs. They're not boots! They're slippers!
A population doesn't have any self-determinative right to tell other people elsewhere whether they can have their own nation or not.  The rest of Turkey doesn't have some inalienable right to dictate the fate of land they aren't living on just because it falls within an arbitrary line.  Self determination is not tyranny of other people somewhere else over the wishes of your community for independence.  It is precisely the opposite.  Heck, think about it this way: the population majority in England wanted the American colonies to remain subject to the Empire, since it was profitable to England for them to be so.  True, the colonists couldn't vote, but they couldn't have gotten a net majority of the population in England and the colonies for colonial independence even if everyone could vote.  The Americans had a right to self determinate, and not be governed by a population that wasn't their own.  So too do the Kurds, and every other localized minority that is tired of its treatment at the hands of a majority that lives elsewhere.
NO! YOU RUINED IT!
Did you know the Bible has two completely different creation stories and one follows the other?
In Communist China, you doctor yet?
That's the joke. 
InDesign.
Are you not from the internet? Moralfags not allowed.
I interpreted it with respects to the consequences of the quantum-foam environment predicted and validated in QED. Seeing the underlining nature of reality, I guess. It's not really clever, though...
It's good to see that a convicted felon can still find work after getting out of jail.
It is. It's mostly people bragging about their girlfriend, which is pretty uncouth. After that, it's mainly schoolyard-esque bouts of claims to moral superiority: there is a choking fog of "holier-than-thou" attitude that permeates pretty much every interchange here. There are also a bunch of super left-wing folks here, and dealing with extremists is never too pleasant. Lastly: most of reddit is fake, is performance art, it's "Letters to Penthouse." Being surrounded by falsities and put-ons is, well, by definition disingenuous, which I find unpleasant.
I think hoboballs meant with a 'thank you' card, not a gift card or the like.
[Dunning-Kruger effect](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dunning%E2%80%93Kruger_effect) says basically that.
I'll be sure to take a look next time I'm on, thanks!  Checking some replays might help me in certain strategies and how I'm supposed to carry myself in the game.  Of course, it's still mostly going to be trial by fire.
yeah similar here, but it wears off. He fell into that category of 'looks like a baby' category of babies. The other category is babies that look like old people which can freak some people out.  People are weird though with the random attention they give. We went out with 2 other babies and their parents one day, my boy, a cute girl and a boy that looked like the Leprechaun in, well, Leprechaun. People would come over, and coo at my boy, the girl, and then quietly passover the leprechaun. It was quite funny (although obviously a little hard on the parents - who to be fair, love their kid but were the first to describe him as a leprechaun). It was like the scene in The Office (UK) where David Brent is 'reassuring' staff that they wont get fired "You're not losing your job, youre not getting fired, &lt;skips someone&gt;, youre not getting fired". It was all in the "what wasnt said". I took him out for his first 6 weeks (I'm the father) because his mum struggled to get around with the caesarian scars (didnt go well) so I got a lot of attention. Now he's 19 months, he has a killer smile which he tries to hide. In the queue at the supermarket, someone will catch his eye and do the 'hello you' thing, he'll stare at them, hold their gaze, and then do the 'trying not to smile' thing and burst out laughing. People go apeshit for that. Its cute as hell. In a few years though I expect him to just kick childless people in the shins, just to give them something to moan about on Reddit.   Be proud for now, dont let people touch if thats not what you want (but noones going to hurt her of course).   And germs? Really? You cant really avoid germs... unless youre a superhero and your ability is to see germs. Common sense will prevail.
No faster but less controlled.
What else is there to do?  I'm not sure how things work in Canada, but hopefully you can get yourself on unemployment of some sort or another.   It also sound like you should be able to find a much better job in the future anyways. I have always thought of "bad" things as more of "big changes."
Nope: If I were in any way to marginalize  Your commas around the 'in any way' are right but that button on my laptop is busted
Yeah the multiple AU/s warpspeed is strange. But if they make it more realistic so you can engage in combat a few hours before the opponent sees you on field I won't complain.  Or, of they would see you on field, but also constantly warping in for hours. Strange
 Just because your mom is in it, don't make it better.
e.g. Firefly, Dollhouse... :/
Boise St. is a terrible football team anyway! LOL!
I was Robin for Halloween this past year. Fuck yeah, homemade costumes!
I thought it was a proposal until I read this.
wow... last one rly hurt
They don't want to lose their jobs or wind up on some police pervert list... I bet if you came on strong you would get some takers.
You know, even if you don't make it... your about to have one helluva time.  tonight, i smoke to you good sir. for even if you don't succeed... you are an inspiration to us all (... or just me at least)
I put ground up cayenne pepper in it to make it spicy it's delicious! 
[Bam!](http://i.imgur.com/h4Ehb.png)
Grid is a keyboard setup in SC2 where the hotkey position are in the same positions as the buttons on the bottom right.  So for example for zerg, Q would be drones, W is overlord, E is zerglings, A would be roach(?)  For a terran barracks, Q would be marine, W marauder, E reaper, and R ghost  Make sense?
If you think it's bad just visit r/debateachrisitan. r/atheism redditors are ruthless on there...   You make a great point. Thanks for the post.
Bitches don't know 'bout my dark passenger.
We raised $500,000 for charity so we could have a rally to tell Glenn Beck to go fuck himself.
Thank you very much, anything will do besides these slow cars! I loved the R1 cars in Forza 2. Can't wait to get myself into some of those :)   
&gt; afterwards
I can tell this is going to be a depressing thread. I'm a student (HS senior). Is there *anything* to look forward to out there?
Yep. Crate hat inflation. If you're going to craft a hat now, you should just buy two crate hats and combine them.  But I'd just save the two refined and buy the hat directly. Barring a select few (Polycount set hats, Medic Mask, Whiskers, Dapper, Raincatcher) you can probably buy any non-vintage hat you want for 2 refined or less.
Are these supposed to be words to study and reflect on, presumably repeatedly, or is there more to this mind training than that? 
a lot, if not most of the damning shit in the leak was from the bush era.
&gt;That prices are not rising does not mean that "everything is fine". I didn't say everything was fine. I'm just not worried about inflation. &gt;With inflation through the loan market, the economy becomes distorted and is set upon a path with an inevitable crash later on. As long as interest rates stay low I'm not worried. Low interest rates are what keep debt manageable.
Well, yeah. The faster you cleanse, the more you get out of. but then there's the whole trade-off of using it for something minor instinctively. but that's kinda beside the point.
So you want the "free-choice" to force other people to breathe in your smoke.  Fuck you.  Where's my "free-choice" not to breathe in smoke?  I'm not exercising "free choice" when I move away from smokers - my choice was taken away by them.
I thought it was a great review and it brought the iOS shortcomings to light. I thought they were fairly bad, but I didn't know it was that bad.   I have an Archos tablet right now which is ok, a bit underpowered, but it's manageable. I'm waiting on the Notion Ink Adam tablet though, that thing is a powerhouse.
welcome to the internet
I think that's a good thing that he hasn't watched it.
Yeah, sure - we know you can whine and rant - but evidence... got any?
Good point.  I would imagine that, on the whole, self.post-only reddits lean more heavily toward comment-oriented strategies.
yeah, I remember when we all chipped in so we could have one of those.
Are you happy or upset by the leak? You say the agency was affected. This might be a dumb question, but do you mean negatively affected?
Used it for a long time, but finally switched back. Error rate was too high and response too laggy on my Hero. May try again whenever I have a faster phone
I was a rep selling copiers several years ago and had a customer at an AIDS foundation warehouse.  They put one of the copiers in a supply room.  Also in the supply room was their stash of condoms.  Let me tell you, they had alot of condoms.
My statement employs sound reason and grammar; if you do not understand it, please re-read it.   Libel is defined as:  &gt;1 &gt;a : a written statement in which a plaintiff in certain courts sets forth the cause of action or the relief sought b archaic : a handbill especially attacking or defaming someone &gt;2 &gt;a : a written or oral defamatory statement or representation that conveys an unjustly unfavorable impression b (1) : a statement or representation published without just cause and tending to expose another to public contempt (2) : defamation of a person by written or representational means (3) : the publication of blasphemous, treasonable, seditious, or obscene writings or pictures (4) : the act, tort, or crime of publishing such a libel   "Innocent until proven guilty," still applies in civil cases, meaning that it is not Libel until proven to be libel. If the plaintiff cannot prove that the claim is untrue, then it is not libel. Yes, you are right, in a court of law,"it was the truth," would not stand, but it is up to the plaintiff to prove that the written statement was untrue for it to qualify as libel.
Unfortunately that's a question we'll never know the answer to.  It's easy to speculate about how things would have been affected if the banks had been allowed to fall, or if we'd given the money directly to the homeowners, but without the actual events happening, no one will really know for sure.  It does seem like it might have been a better way of doing things, but unfortunately the common person doesn't have a lobbyist at his/her disposal to suggest it.
Run! Get out of the house now!  
I hate this part, every time i come to it. Its all about timing. 
ma'am actually :) and pitt.
wtf? why does everyone in r/soccer hate each other all of the sudden? what happened to the camaraderie of all being soccer fans?  can't we just agree that every league has their own level of skill and competition? jesus, people, take a chill pill.
I bet the child's mother could use some *comforting* if you know what I mean.
&gt;People have been saying the same shit about violent videogames for years This isn't the same as the claims made by video game opponents at all. Children can tell the difference between fiction and nonfiction (for the most part) and just because they see violence being committed by cartoon characters doesn't mean that they will go out and do the same thing, but children have always learned values by the stories that are told to them. It's not as simple as kids blindly imitating what they see on television, but if they are constantly exposed to the idea that (for instance) women are not as smart as men, they will grow up believing that, at least until they learn differently. But if girls are being taught the same thing they also modify their behavior based on the same mistaken belief. Obviously, cartoons are not the source of the belief that girls are not as smart as men, but they do perpetuate it. &gt;What you expect should have an effect != what has an effect Well, what does have an effect, then? Do you think that children's behavior is innate? Children learn by watching and imitating. Why do you think television is any different than any other thing that children learn from? Many kids spend as much time watching television as they do talking to their parents, at it has a big effect on them. If you google it, you will find tons of evidence for both sides, most of it is bullshit because, well, sociology is pretty much all bullshit. Plus, as society's opinions change, those changes are reflected in children's shows, so how can you isolate the effects of television from all of those other factors? Psychological experimentation would be the best way if it wasn't terribly unethical.
Because I'm awesome.
Clearly the baby was possessed by demons. *rolls eyes*
How do you know she rocks?  She might be leading her office to the bottom 20% or some other reason she was chosen, and others weren't.  Let's get all sides of this sordid tale....
Get out of my head.
&gt; gravity uses energy to pull things in  This is not the case.  Energy is conserved in any gravitational field.
Did anyone find the pieces of the Triforce I hid?
The largest version available: http://i.imgur.com/JEUhy.jpg  From the artist's website.
That has everything to do with those women and the environment that condones a mature woman fawning over a real young man, and nothing to do with Stephenie Meyer.
What was the setup that made it possible for these files to be available to someone like Manning?  Were they just on a file share?   Was there any auditing?   Why wasn't there at the very least a request system that requires people to formally explain why they need access and provides a record who accessed what files and why?  The media is reporting policy changes limiting flash drives and the state department no longer providing some information for this network.  Will these changes make any difference?  Isn't it fairly trivial to sneak in a tiny flash drive even if people are searched on entry? Is this network connected to the Internet?   If so, what is to stop someone from copying files out through the network?  Is there proper auditing so that alarms would go off is someone transmitted a few gigs of data out bound?  Do you feel like the Army is generally competent when it comes to computer security?
Or just breathe on her.
Theatre de la Jeune Lune. Absolutely brilliant company.  At least most of the actors are still around.
Pedophilia is not usually based on physically outmatching someone. It is based on manipulation and abuse of power. Women are also vastly more likely to go unpunished for it.
I never asked for any advice.  Was just looking for a sounding board.
Seems like a nice one. At 5lbs it's a bit heavier than I would want, but that's because it's a 2 person tent. But once again, you're not walking everywhere. It'll give you some room to keep stuff next to you. In mine, I store my pack outside the tent proper, but still under the rainfly, which sticks out a foot and a half from the door. This one has that as well. You'll be able to stretch out a bit more, which is a nice luxury. Mine is shaped like a coffin. :)   It looks pretty awesome though. I love the price too.  I just love the review put up by "George Peter". I guess he doesn't know what a rain fly is... You'd think perhaps to set up your tent at home before taking it in the field? Ha!  All this talk of tents and travel has me wanting to hit the road... NOW.  Edit: Annnd this is about the Limelight of course. I should have replied to the other comment.
I switched to safari and it worked fine so I'm guessing someone just messed with a firefox extension or something...   Oh well, class is over and I'm home now anyway.
I remember when I went Cal Poly I got super high before my calculus class and I remember looking at the numbers and thinking "... I forget how to count". I promptly went home and smoked more. Probably why I WENT to Cal Poly, now that I think of it.
sure am glad to see that the bullshit hasn't stopped.  
Yes, and they weren't backwards compatible with larger storage disks.  *Good riddance!*
No one is safe...
That show bores the piss out of me.  I honestly can't bring myself to care about anyone on that show.  Lets do a bunch of dumb shit and be selfish, WITH ZOMBIES.
Have you seen how many people give props to Jay-Z? You weren't expecting to hear any truth here were you?
Adding it to my list!
What should you do?  GTFO, now.  You should have walked out the door 6 months ago.  I don't know you, but I can tell you this with certainty:  your happiness doesn't hinge on her, and you don't have to show her how to do anything.  
yes i understand arrays and objects are different, but what i was trying to say is there is no typeof array.  [Crockford has his own way](http://javascript.crockford.com/remedial.html) of using typeof which properly tells us an array from an object:   function typeOf(value) {  var s = typeof value;  if (s === 'object') {   if (value) {    if (typeof value.length === 'number' &amp;&amp;      !(value.propertyIsEnumerable('length')) &amp;&amp;      typeof value.splice === 'function') {     s = 'array';    }   } else {    s = 'null';   }  }  return s; }
I was talking to a friend some time ago about STD tests, his exact words "Always specify blood.  All tests are done with blood, you'll only make this mistake once if you forget because they ram a swab up your cock"
Exercising has always helped me, but now I've even lost interest for that. I just want to sleep all the time. I'll try reading some of my favorite books though. Thanks!
My parents have a dvr and I would have programed it but it slipped my mind.
Looks fantastic, and I'd love to load JS in order, but a lot of the additional functionality seems to overlap with [modernizr](http://www.modernizr.com/). I love all these libraries that bring everything up to date (IE9.js also comes to mind) - I just wish they were a little bit more modular so that I could run more than one without worrying about script conflicts.
I went and used it as one anyway... the fuzzy out of focus look from stretching it out adds to the appeal. 
35 and i still have mine...
My suit is a partial, so nude in it isn't really an option (partial: arms, legs, feet, hands, head, tail - but no bodysuit). If I had a full bodysuit, I probably would go nude in it on occasion, but with good reason - those things are freaking *hot*, and one of the cons I go to is during the summer.   I don't really have any desire to paint myself as a blue weasel and be nude that way - because as I've mentioned before, I recognize that in RL, I'm human, and I'm comfortable with that.
hate to break it to you, but in Korea, pro Starcraft gamers are hot commodities.  seriously, they have fan clubs and yes, fan girls.  a lot of the famous ones have very attractive girlfriends.  not so true in the US of course, but in Korea SC skill is attractive.
I watched that series last night. Games 3 and 4 are the most exciting things I've watched in recent memory.
http://james-iry.blogspot.com/2009/05/brief-incomplete-and-mostly-wrong.html &gt; 1995 - Brendan Eich reads up on every mistake ever made in designing a programming language, invents a few more, and creates LiveScript. Later, in an effort to cash in on the popularity of Java the language is renamed JavaScript. Later still, in an effort to cash in on the popularity of skin diseases the language is renamed ECMAScript.
oh really?
uruk-hai, nuff said.
If Reddit were to allow us to upload images with our comments...  ... ๏_๏
It will become abundantly clear when you click a link and then some picture pops up of a [pigeon shitting on some kid.](http://www.myshitsandgiggles.com/test/0000.jpg)
you mean you guys don't jump when it goes up?
man thats rough, as a survivor of suicide (father killed himself, never tried myself, never plan too) i offer my thoughts of encouragement and am glad your finally talking about it, it took me a year or two to open up about my dads, its rough cruel shit that no one should ever endure and i wish you the best sir
just a question is the \o/ supposed to be like a person reaching out?
Read. Experience a variety of things. Watch TV. Watch people. A lot of witty humor comes from simply knowing a lot of things, and being able to relate one situation to another. Many people are funny just because they are able to point out something funny in everyday life. That comes from simply being aware at all times.  Watch a lot of standup comedy for inspiration, but try to avoid being that guy who always quotes standup comedians.  Don't spend too much time worrying about whether something is funny or not. If it's funny, waiting too long to say it will kill the humor. If it isn't funny, people will likely forget you even said it within a few minutes.  *PS. Don't TRY to be funny. The harder it seems you're asking for a laugh, the less people are going to laugh.
Four Loko: When three Loko just isn't enough.
exactly. we're not the main characters in this. we're more like the goofy henchmen who laugh just an inch longer than the rest and are pistol whipped and told to shut up. 
Her mother likes to keep tabs on everything in her kitchen and don't like her messing things up, or so she says.   Her mum won't let me wash dishes either :(
That's a BIG BITCH!  movie?
I have been meaning to pick it up, I actually plan on picking it up tomorrow after work. Can't wait to listen to it
no
I think new atheists usually refers to self-proclaimed militant atheists or anti theists such as Hitchens or Dawkins. Of course, your second definition is also used by theist writers.
GOP is the worst OP.
That sounds great to me :) Let me know what's up. I work almost all day, but if I'm free I'm down.
I am completely with you. People can be dicks on this site. However, I feel a kinship to this community. I try to contribute as positively as possible.  Despite assholery (sounds like some weird porno name), I think, for the most part, people are generally chill. The clever/funny shit on this site keeps me coming back. I find a lot of the people here to be highly intelligent. That's a huge draw for me. Whether I perpetuate it is another matter.
Or stock, or fruit juice, or any liquid really.
I hope not.  Totally not my intention at all.  Reading his post blew my mind, finding out that there are others who went through what I thought was my own personal, totally solitary affliction.  Really just want to say, "I know how you feel.  Man, do i know how you feel."
Xoites is simply being a typical feminist...   Argue, shame, attempt to shut down debate, 'misconstrue' arguments, appeal to the crowd while ridiculing, accuse of impotency or other de-masculinizing condition, and then stomp off in a huff.  This is all that Feminists ever do.  They do not 'get won over', they do not even get convinced on one or two issues (DEFINITELY not enough to actually do something about it - although they'll "personally agree" until they're blue in the face). But they serve as excellent rhetorical scratching posts, as well as an excellent example of what happens when you try to 'reconcile' or 'compromise' with a Feminist.  The more of these assholes that come here, and the more time MRAs spend wasting their time on concern trolls that do nothing but eat up MRAs time (and feed them false hope), the better.  It'll make men that much angrier, and that much more determined.  You know, those people women depend upon for protection?  Of course, they will have to deal with the consequences of having enough men so angry at them and the government that men will override their biological impulses to effect change....but if they're too fucking stupid, or self centered to care now, why the fuck should I or anyone else try and save them?  So really, xoites is fun to argue with, but don't read any more into her than that. She's simply a typical sexist feminist...dime a dozen, nothing to see here....
Indeed. He's clearly referring to the extortion attempt as the attack from the "devil," not his infidelity. It's still stupid, but he's not externalizing blame for his own actions.
It only makes "total sense to all of us" if you ignore the fact that Sony is a profit-seeking company with a huge consumer/fan base.  Also, jxhn has already, perhaps inadvertently, expressed one of the two reasons why Sony wouldn't give discounts for those that already own the game to rebuy them digitally: "I'd pay full price for a PS3 compatible version of Bully."  So that's what they do. As long as there is a market for selling remakes of old games at new-game prices, they'll continue with it.  The second reason is that there isn't a good system in place for having the user slip in their old PS2 game and then navigate to a place where they could get this magical discount on the "PS3 compatible" version. This suffers from the same issue as people who wanted Sony to let them have free digital copies of their UMD games on PSP.  Not only would development costs on remakes probably outweigh the benefit in most cases, but it would keep developers from moving to the current-gen console. That's one of the reasons there are so many PSP ports of old games -- because PS3 versions had a much higher, and more expensive, learning curve.  There's simply no way that you can take a mass-produced disc with insignificant copy-protection and put it in the PS3 and validate that it is "your" game. People could just pass around one disc to all their friends and suddenly everyone would have discount or free copies. Sony certainly isn't going to risk their profits so that you and your buddies can get cheap versions of their product.  However what Sony does have a patent for is an adapter for current-gen consoles to old-gen consoles (or disc drive) [as seen here](http://www.siliconera.com/2010/09/14/sony-japan-files-patent-for-new-generation-console-to-previous-generation-console-adapter/). Ideally, such a device would be a base version of a console that would do all the disc decoding before sending it to the main console. The link would likely be proprietary and have some sort of encryption.
I did the same thing kind of. It was $20 to a nice guy in a suit for gas and he gave me his work address to get the money the next day because he "lost his wallet" or something, I don't remember. Anyways, fake address, fake business name, learning experience. It sucks that it makes it harder to help people when there are people trying to scam kindness. But I hope the lady is telling the truth, good luck.
You are a complete cock and I hope you and your AMC Gremlin are forced off the road Hans Moleman-style.
Agreed! He was the first celebrity that I ever cried for. 
I thought condoms were illegal in Kansas
I'm not you're pal, buddy.
Well, then I would still say that war is inherently evil, just somethings happen to be evil enough to justify it.   Perhaps then, likewise, sexism in the form of special opportunities for women is inherently wrong, but in the face of the generally sexist environment we live in, it is at times justified.  With respect to science in colleges (the issue of this post) my university recently celebrated a record high of 25% women in our college of science and engineering. There is something that needs addressing with this. 
&gt;/r/atheism and /r/politics I'm looking in your direction.  This is why I don't subscribe to these cesspools.
and wasteful. Thanks subconscious!
Very cool.
Every developer who ever did any freelance for the guys at Groupon and combing through any old contracts to see if they own this shit.
*warglbargl*
huh?
"Remember in the movie *Predator* how the Predator can see heat? So, he's looking out at the jungle, and plants show up on his viewscreen. That's because plants have a different infrared signature from, say, dirt, or Arnold Schwarzenegger. This tool is basically like the Predator's heat vision, but it's like Predator-vision if the Predator was hunting plants. It can tell the difference between plants and non-plants based on the infra-red signature. Right, I was just getting to that...what if it *is* a cold plant? Well, turns out, the heat signature given off by a cold plant is different in some weird ways from something that's not a plant...I don't want to get all crazy with technical details here, but, it's like...you know how poison ivy is shiny? Well, same sort of thing. We can detect that sort of shininess, and that's how we tell if it's a plant. But basically, it's because we have Predator-vision. Hey, I gotta run...ain't got time to bleed! Heh."  Is that 100% accurate? I have no idea. Probably not. But it makes for a great story that your boss can tell to management, and if you're lucky, he tells management that you were the one who came up with the explanation, you get asked to repeat it at the Christmas party, and suddenly, people realize that Mechtonia has a pretty interesting way of explaining things, and your career goes from there.   I'm completely serious about that. Unless you're the "captain" from the get-go, people skills are going to help your career far more than straight up tech skills. Is that fair? I dunno. Remember that people are monkeys, businesses are like high school, and go from there.
You're correct in that contracts are only as powerful as the government that is willing to uphold them, but I don't see how holding this particular contract as legal and binding would be even close to a pseudo first amendment violation. The parties (as best as I can tell) entered into it with full disclosure and without any sort of coercion. The OP willingly signed away his right to publicly expose any and all private communications as well as the right to express his negative thoughts regarding the company. Unless I'm mistaken, you're allowed to waive your civil rights as long as you're not coerced into doing so.  I'm obviously playing devil's advocate here, but I'm genuinely curious to see your reasoning behind your argument. I think I understand the reasoning behind the unconscionable exception, but I'm still curious as to how that would affect the enforceability of this particular contract. 
If you think Reddit isn't nice, stay the hell away from Fark.
overt misogyny is downvoted, but the subtle threads of it run in the majority of the posts and comments
ditto. Moge 565 NA
It sickens me, too.  Lets hope the HRC stops instigating it. ;)
Not unless you call college/university "high school." in high school it would have just been "Philosophy."
Unfortunately, gastronomic bliss comes with a hefty price tag. That beauty is $15.
60 fps on isn't great for a console port. If he's willing to spend $300 then he can get a little more lifespan.
i think i see the virgin mary on the ring finger...
SitTING on A BArsTULE!
u mad bro? SlowOCR_13 speaks the truth. Go back to /r/atheism to circlejerk with the rest of the tards.
Everyone likes their own flavor.
I can't believe you got a picture of me!! I'm in the car behind that idiot.
I feel your pain, molecular basis of immunity midterm on the 13th :S
We fuckin here or what?
Too frothing-at-the-mouth to type properly?
My last gf liked this, too. It was awesome.  edit: to downvoters, my gf enjoyed this. i wasn't trying degrade her. we both engaged in a mutually pleasing activity.
Man, your friends are jerks. Even if I didn't like someones joke on facebook, I wouldn't spam their wall with all that negative crap.
Off road.
I had a girlfriend once who would do that when she paid the bills.  She'd leave hand written thank you notes in the envelope, or sometimes just one the envelopes themselves.  She was pretty awesome.
God dammit Japa--PUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDI PUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDIPUDDI PUDDIPUDDIPUDDI
Well, I do have to occasionally ask if my balls are too big for the skirt I'm wearing. 
There's a story-within-a-story in David Foster Wallace's _The Broom of the System_ where the protagonist falls in love with everyone he sees.  As soon as I saw this submission, I racked my brain trying to figure out why her story seemed so familiar.
It's...from the same quote...*sigh*
I saw them recently with Keelhaul.  If you like Russian Circles, you might like Keelhaul.
Won't she have a criminal conviction on her record?  That's how it works in the states.
Ok mate, you keep on re-inventing the wheel.  For the rest of us in the civilised world, a gun needn't be used to be respected.
yeah, those 400mm f/2.8's are pretty weighty. ;)
*facepalm*
Every week there's a thread about Game Night. Just [keep your eye out](http://www.reddit.com/r/Seattle/search?q=game+night&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on).
Well you can't go wrong with a drop of whiskey in a bottle to help with teething babies. Seems like you can just build from there.  Edit: Oh, she's 13. I'm afraid to tell you if you haven't started helping her drink yet, her friends beat you to it.
Yes, anyway to make this a "Sticky"?
**HE HAS A GIRLFRIEND**.
Welcome to the Internet. Harden up.
I'm still using mine for /etc backup. I'll try to get a SCSI version to use with my Atari Falcon030 too.
 Male nurse.  I've heard every Gay Lord Focker joke there is.
A cool little secret, don't tell anyone.  Go here: http://minecraft.net/survivaltest/ Start a game. Hit F5.
i dont know.... what is going on?  can someone provide some insight?
Uh, male or female?
come by r/houston
 Being able to kill bosses translates to more achievements in the game, if you can get the achievement "Bane of the Fallen King", you're probably not going to have too much trouble getting "We're on a boat". Having fished enough to get "Old Ironjaw" however, does not help you get either of those achievements, you won't have gear or experience after working on it.   I do agree with you though, whatever makes you happier.
&gt;You describe your leader and add a part about his terrible flatulence and misogyny.  You should be fired. Full stop.   Thats not what the American people pay you to do. They pay you to know, they don't pay you to add mindless tabloid style information. You are a professional
Wow, these look tasty. I'm doing brown rice for dinner with my stir-fry for lack of anything better... until now. Next trip to WF is gonna yield me a cartful of these bad boys.
As much as he understands money at all, he understands that it's expensive, and he knows it needs to be looked after carefully. Although that doesn't seem to extend to sticky fingers.
Falcons are overrated. Chargers are underrated.
Gina Trapani, the main editor left. I think, and this is pure speculation, that around this time gawker started getting more hands on with the site as well.
Congrats to you good sir. My boyfriend isn't terribly artistic/romantic, but he does cheesy little things once in a while that I love :) It's the thought that counts, and the I'm sure she'll love it. Good luck!
Same wtf 404 pages are internet art
On one hand, I understand where the argument that these diplomatic missives need to be kept secret comes from.  Having to worry about what a, let's face it, melodramatic and mis-informed populace is going to think of what you're saying while also worrying about solving whatever foreign policy screwup that you've got to step in on will hamper diplomats' ability to do their work.  It's the same way in politics.  Because of the cable news cycle and the endless spin, politicians are basically playing Stephen Colbert-esque characters when the cameras are on, and can only really get shit done like sane people behind closed doors.  On the other hand, I think that there's a fundamental trust that has been abused.  For a long time, we as a people have accepted that politicians/diplomats know what they're doing and that we can trust them to do their jobs without us having to know the details.  They abused that trust.  They're not doing their jobs.  And now they're surprised when they lose the benefits of the trust that they've lost. Given that our leaders have proven that they can't be trusted to behave under the veil of secrecy, I think they're just going to have to figure out how to get things done in the light. It won't be perfect, but it wasn't perfect, before. To give a specific example:  Indonesia isn't a human rights paradise yet, is it?  Maybe those pictures going public would have created a greater swell of outrage that would have led to larger changes, or at least a more open discussion about what was going on there.  
We don't suffer fools gladly here, that's for sure.  Although we're not against being fools ourselves, either.
I still haven't picked mine out because I just don't know what to do! I don't want them to hate what I get them! :(
He was one of those poor kids who was born on Christmas. Even though they got 'separate' presents, you always felt bad.
That's what I was thinking as I installed this on my machine at work. It is, as you would think a state owned computer on military base, totally locked down for any sort of "customization". I can't even change the wallpaper. I was enthralled when Chrome worked. Just sharing my experience, not doubting your statements in anyway.
upvoted for fine bracket work. a true master of the craft.
I suggest Bertrand Russell's [A history of Western Philosophy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/A_History_of_Western_Philosophy). It is a very insightful walkthrough on philosophical development, also through christianity and its main protagonists, but not only. Any atheist should, in my opinion, be highly knowledgeable in history of philosophy, and philosophy as well if possible. 
I'm a geologist. I like it. I get to split my time between the office (Reddit!) and outside at job sites. The company is pretty small and chill enough to let me bring my dog. It's an environmental engineering firm, so at a basic level I feel good about what I do to pay the bills.  Speaking of which, I've finished my snack and should get back to work.
Anything you didn't cover is probably in this article: http://sports.yahoo.com/nba/news?slug=aw-heatfreeagency071610  Probably the best write up of the whole situation. OH, lets not forget the Jordran Crawford incident or that reporter who followed him around during some party
I'd like to present to you: /r/rape, /r/PicsOfDeadKids, /r/gore... the list goes on. Jailbait is pretty sane. If you also think that /r/nsfw, /r/gonewild and /r/volleyballgirls (or whatever it is called) also have some potentially jailbait material you'll start banning everything. Reddit.com doesn't have the man power (no one has it actually) to fight back everything that can be considered unethical on this website.  I say let it be.
There is a ghost in that picture, coming out of the back of that truck
amusing or clever t-shirts are always lame, sadly.
Odd - no trouble here (I forgot which address I originally registered with). Use a gmail account, mark any spam as spam, problem disappears.
I own that one. I actually posted about it before I got it. That's [here.](http://www.reddit.com/r/photography/comments/du2ba/small_pocket_light_meter_suggestions/) There are a few good suggestions in there too.  As for my first hand experience, it works great, and it works great for what I put it through.
"Indeed, Dunning et al. cite a study saying that 94% of college professors rank their work as "above average" (relative to their peers), to underscore that the highly intelligent and informed are hardly exempt." (from the page)
What?  Hivemind Reddit is never wrong!
Fox is funded and endorsed by right-wing elites. 
any luck?
Damn, you all are pathetic.
it was a heineken light....who cares
Oh Jehuty, exit ramps. I spend 6-8 hours a week on toll roads (US), and it's always the same crap -- I'll see the sign saying "Exit Only", give the person to the right of me a little time to get over if they want, and they stay where they are. A minute later, they get to the actual exit, and swerve on over without a blinker.  The worst of it is on the way home, though, during rush hour traffic, on a non-toll road. A light there is terribly timed, to the point you can see nothing but tail lights ahead of you for 50 cars or so, as the light is also at the top of a hill. The road leading up to it is three lanes, but the third lane just ends (to a turn lane that currently leads to an empty plot) a few dozen feet before the light itself. So traffic will come to a complete, 0mph, put-it-in-park stop in the left two lanes with the right lane empty (because we know about the turn). Except for the occasional guy barreling down the right lane at 50mph. I can just imagine that driver making the PFFFCH (?) face, thinking to themselves, "LOL, I GUESS NOBODY ELSE NOTICED THERE'S ANOTHER LANE HERE." I know they might assume those are both left turn lanes, but you can visibly see the light at the top of the hill and that there's only two lanes there.  Of course, the painful thing is that people inevitably let this driver in, so they're effectively passing everyone else. Maybe they just don't know, but it's also possibly they realize this lets them skip a good deal of traffic.
Do you happen to know Doctor Spaceman?
It originally came about in the days when ships had steering oars, before rudders were known in Europe.  Look at illustrations of ships prior to about 1000 years ago - they all had steering oars on the right hand side - "Steerboard" became "starboard". Ships with steering oars on the right couldn't tie up right side to the dock, otherwise the steering oar would be damaged.  Hence they tied up left side to.  So the left side was the "port" side, the side of the ship tied to the dock. See wikipedia for the [etymology of the words port and starboard](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Port_and_starboard#Etymology).
hit a point that i think deserves a momentary elaboration.  you'll find many of these people who feel as if meaningless conversation such as "thanks" shouldn't be here. these are the people who don't small talk (unless it is their own small talk.), and wrap trivial nicities (manners, for example) as unnecessary social weight. Possible symptom of the whole "Generation ME" idea spanning a couple generations now? I think so; I see it in my friends (and our younger siblings, nieces &amp; nephews) and I trace it to parents who focused our minds on "what's in it for me" instead of "what's in it for the community."  you can even think of them like coders who attack source viciously, tracking down every unnecessary bit and byte, looking to squeeze every extraneous character of unnecessary markup right out of sight.  tl:dr; these people can't "talk to talk", and make boring dinner guests.
That's a great story.  Are there any ultra-realistic simulators available for more common aircraft like single engine planes and helicopters?  That might come in handy some day, you never know.  Guaranteed to get you laid at least once.
"you ain't my fuckin mom!"
Ugh, there's so many, but Tairy Greene never disappoints. One of my absolute favorite things about the show is the names they use.   I also love Kids Break, I wish they had made more.
sounds like extortion to me
aww that's the cutest thing I have seen today. Thanks!
Star Trek 4 was a fun way to cap off a great trilogy  Star Trek 5 was an insultingly stupid movie that did a disservice to the entire cast.  It was an artistic, technical, and mechanical failure. Satr Trek 6 was return to form that understood its characters, and had just the right balance between politics and space battles.  It acts as though Star Trek 5 never happened.  The Star Trek franchise is in every way better if we ignore 5 and jump right from 4 to 6.  I want Nintendo to make Metroid: The Undiscovered Country if you know what I mean.
Agreed with Rottinguy. /r/JailBait is ca$h money for Conde Nast and Reddit.  Don't let anyone ever tell you that the admins are looking out to protect you.
then we can go back to the beginnings of the web when netscape used to list all the new websites added that day.  now it's like 40 million a day or something so that would be impossible, but with a new dns system to populate and manually confirm/test/vet, a new-to-the-net list or reddit clone perhaps could be created as the starting point. use what we know now about network infrastructure design and implementation and apply it to our current interconnected society. i like. i like.
A guys walks into a bar...in this case it was a crowbar and thats my story and im stickin to it. 
I disagree. You were well within your rights, and she should have known (and probably *did* know) that "reporting" you was going to have precisely **zero** effect, since what you did is not the slightest bit illegal.  You weren't being an asshole. *She* was just being a nasty old cunt.  EDIT: IAmA retard who doesn't read posts completely before replying. Come to think of it, I did think it was sort of odd that he knew the exact age of the greeter.
Beautiful.
The reason I haven't come out is that I'm worried about whether my grandmother will kick me out of the house or not. She's fucking crazy and also very religious.
A literal self inflicted punch to the stomach and/or face usually does the trick for me. Only crazy people talk to themselves.
Now you're thinking with portals!
Hey, take a look at this from an article... &gt;The new Wikileaks revelations, purporting to be from U.S. State Department cables and published by several Western papers, raised questions about the future of the relationship between China and North Korea described in the past as being as close as "lips and teeth."  In one cable by the U.S. ambassador to Seoul, a top South Korean official is described as saying in February that some Chinese officials would not intervene if North Korea collapsed.  U.S. Ambassador Kathleen Stephens wrote that Chun Yung-woo, then the vice foreign minister for South Korea, said the younger generation of communist leaders in China would not risk new armed conflict on the Korean Peninsula, the Guardian reported.  Some analysts were skeptical.  "My personal advice is that the report has been misplaced," said Wang Dong, a professor at Peking University. North Korea is a strategic question for China, not a financial or economic one. He said they have made a mistake about China's viewpoint.  
Try watching some mind numbing and hilarious comedy anime's like Hayate, just anything that is completely offbeat from what you just watched.  Also, if you enjoyed the emotional headbutt that ToraDora causes, try angel beats. WARNING: you will laugh and cry till you shit pineapples.
This makes me sad.   I'm assuming you read all of [them](http://ragetoons.com/). That was absolutely the worst use of the troll face yet to exist.  
Nope. Depending on the type of tape, pulling the tape off afterwards would hurt just as much as grease popping onto it.
EVERYONE MAKE WAY, WE GOT OURSELVES AN INTERNET TOUGH GUY HERE!
wouldn't mind taking that around the US
I don't know why this makes me rage, but it does... It's not that I disagree much in anyway with any of these...  /randommusings
I would say at least 60 percent looks good enough to eat, just be careful and be sure to eat around the green stuff 
Personally I love it.  I play it every night.  This weekend since the update I played for 8 hours straight.  Then took a 2 hour break then went back for more.  The game is much better with a great LS.
Yea, pretty much, you use a tutoring site?  What is it?
Nice boobs
I was going to disagree with you based on mayors of cities like Chicago and NY telling you that you can't carry but they have security detail. But Michigan is shall issue and it doesn't appear Detroit has any local laws that are stricter than the state law (it even appears that MI has laws against local gun laws), so this is a long way of saying I agree with you. Although, it is interesting info nonetheless.
That was the fourth episode, 'Vatos'.
It took too much of my life. DON'T EVER GO BACK.
*upvotes*  *confirms Mitchell and Webb*  Upvote remains. :D
Damn! Wanted to catch that one. My roommate quite literally got the last ticket that night. I was pretty stoked for both bands. Funny how they have some similar sounds (hence similar names?).   I was a bit apprehensive about the Black Angels, honestly, as their Letterman appearance was shit. Did that come together better?
Hmmm... If a respected pro-dom will *never* do choking, should the rest of us do? Probably not. Should some guy advise a complete beginner to do it at full strength (*choke the shit out of her*)? Never, no way. That is completely irresponsible.  As to condescending... Look, it's one thing to list all your fantasies/all the stuff you like in porn, and it's one thing to give advice to a beginner. You clearly don't see the difference. And sorry for going all Spiderman-y on you, but with great powers come great responsibilities, and BDSM gives great power to the dom, so the kind of irresponsible attitude you displayed has no place here. That's all I think about it, no more, no less.
I Just found a zip disk with only my name written on it...I Really wonder whats on It  Guess I'll never know.   Ps&gt; remember the feeling, HOLY SHIT IT Holds a gig of stuff, i'll never be able to fill that
Interesting, I might have to look into that.   In any case, do not use the bottom of a coffee mug, it does not turn out well. My brother used one on my dad's van and we had white scratches on the side windows until the day that it died. A Tim Horton's coffee cup works well in a pinch though
This guy's fault for not training his parents: "NEVER CALL THE COPS".
I read Hemingway, Plath, and Poe as an adolescent, why am I not depressed, morbid, and suicidal?
I enjoyed Eric Bischoff's "Controversy Creates Ca$h".
Upvoted for using the word recalcitrant indirectly
Oh, I'm from louisiana, trust me there is cayenne in it.
 Here ya go...  http://www.reddit.com/r/zombies/comments/ee6l8/my_dad_was_a_zombie_slayer/
True, those weasels are very wily!
Christmas is a holiday to commemorate the birth of Jesus.  Now - I am all for non-religious people celebrating Christmas as they see appropriate. Further, I understand if people are bothered by the reminder that Jesus is the reason for the season.   But, the fact is - it is true.
No, black friday
The Church says that Joseph Smith translated some Egyptian papryi and that's how he came up with it.  Now, some documents have arisen that were purported to be these papryi and have been proven to be referring to something other than what Joseph translated.  So the question remains:  Were these in fact the documents he translated from?  Or are they still missing?  
i want a sewing machine =(
A full tear down on any mac laptop can take hours. Just a HD swap is a days work if you have no clue what you are doing.  I am one of those idiots who takes things apart with no idea what I'm doing.
I hereby give you a ... *standing ovation*
I did. It was a good read; it's sad that people can't be bothered to read. Particularly when the topic lies so close to their interests. 
Wow. Amazing.
Definately, which is why he should be tried. However, there is still right and wrong. He broke the law knowingly, believing that the government was keeping information from the people it's supposed to serve. If the government lied about the justification for a war, the people need to know.  Manning should be tried. Hopefully found not guilty by jury nullification, otherwise serve his sentence. Either way he's a hero for acting on his principles
There's an ever increasing list of [recommended books in the r/atheism FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/atheism#RecommendedReading) And if you scroll down, there is a list of videos with links to watch them
By now, it's kinda like I've got a system...and that whole "if it ain't broke don't fix it" rule definitely applies...I'm a diehard advocate of these little cams (now, if only I could get SONY to comp me a few...)
new reach maps just came out today.  I've only played 2 of them but they were both sweet.  More of what i was hoping for when reach came out because i felt the maps were lacking
I came.
Yeah, well, some commenters at /MR advocate violence too...
I too had no arms until I was 13. I'm sorry you have no arms.
Baby seal walks into a club...
Well that's only like...across the entire country.   But you are a really good cook right? 
.secneuqesnoc sah yportne gnisreveR
if you go to court and plead no contest it might get lowered they might even let you do payments, if you ask
Dry. Very dry.  I like it.
Woah, man!  I love it!!  Where can I get the download?!
The major problems with google wave were that it was slow, almost completely unusable and didn't solve any new problems. Other than that, it wasn't the worst thing to come out of google, after all it didn't go war-driving and record anyone's private data so that puts it ahead of the curve...
I'm surprised no white knights beat them silly.  If I were at a party where some guy was telling me to go fuck an unconscious girl, I'd probably call the cops.
Well in 6 or so months, I'll be able to go back to school and have it fully paid off as long as I maintain certain goals in it.  I don't know if I'd be able to get the C that they want though. I mostly did D's in high school. :&gt;
I present to Reddit for your viewing pleasure: The Boston Tea Party  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RFoPMGkE__o
I don't see the problem with "Soon?", the renaissance was the bridge between the middle ages and the modern era.   Or should he have said "what is a renaissance?" perhaps? :)
Correction, [here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v_ljoL2RfA0&amp;feature=related) it is.
Regardless of who was killed, this is a really insensitive title.
If I recall correctly there's an agency that solely deals with criminals who want to reform. They are a casting agency for thug type extras. I can't remember the name for the life of me, but they're legit.
I got an ice cream headache putting on my helmet to ride to work today. Don't remind me about warm summer nights.
Thank you. A voice of reason. This isn't an attack, people. This is a wake up call to know your bible. If I'm shaking your faith with this, that's a pretty sad state of faith.
commercially that cant be disputed
This is usage of 'fascist' is what the commenter is complaining about -- 'fascist' has a *very* specific definition, it's not just a generic negative quality. The US government and/or US media have very few of the qualities necessary for fascism.
If you adopt from a government type shelter the animals are spayed/neutered before they are put up for adoption. I don't know if the "no kill" private shelters do. 
The last time that I made them, I soaked the chickpeas for about 15 hours (I forgot to look at them first thing in the morning), and then put them in the crockpot with the rest of the ingredients.  It took a very long time to get the chickpeas past the crunchy stage, but, as I said, I think that mine were old.  My guess is that I cooked them in the crockpot for 8 hours on low before everything was not crunchy.   I'm not an expert on making hummous, but my experience is that the dried chickpeas take a long time.  Mine had also been in the pantry for quite a while...if you were using fresher ones I think that it would take less time. 
HAHAHA, "Thats Right We'll Fuck Your Wife"
*Clicks link* "Wow, that is a beautiful lamp" ... "Wait, didn't he say nightstand?" *Looks down*  "Oh"    I mean, I'm happy that your happy. Nothing like building something with your own two hands. But I think we have different tastes ;-)
Nice story.  You should submit your fiction to a publisher.  
Yesterday a friend and I tried Malphite / Chogath Needless to say because of my bullshit Q he could land every stun and we were something like 6-0 15 minutes in.
20% of Americans can't identify the US on a map.  What proportion can remember from high school science that organic molecules contain carbon, the whole carbon cycle, energies released etc etc?  You're preaching to the unconvertable.
I think the problem is with soo many crashes and performance issues raising the textures would make the problem worse.   Maybe once we are out of alpha aesthetics can be looked at.  Its not like people buy this game expecting things to look nice.
The article forgets to mention that reactivation of TERC/TERT is also a very very common pathway for neoplastic transformation.  
Gentle Alarm seems to be a very cool app where someone has put in a lot of effort, and I don't doubt that continously raising the volume is a great innovative way of waking one up, and on top of that it looks very good. I don't mind trying it out a bit.  But it's definitely not just a simple alarm clock. The steps you mentioned are not sufficient, at least on my fresh install, maybe it sets some defaults differently after using it. First, after pressing quick alarm I need to select the "at xx:yy o'clock" mode in a dropdown, then after pressing set alarm I need to press the red on/off logo on the top left. And all this involves some mental work to get it done, when I just want to go to sleep.  Anyway, good night, I'm going to bed now and will be greeted by 5 different alarm clocks trying to wake me up tomorrow ...
I prefer moving space, rather than merely moving through space, and our camouflage is so effective, you can't tell us apart from the normal humans.  I would blame your Earth media for heavily associating U.F.O.s with extraterrestrial life.
It's... It's beautiful...
Thanksgiving, dog in a box.
good luck with ipv6
Wish some of that wasn't cut off.
Don't forget [/r/musicessentials](http://musicessentials.reddit.com).
sincerely that club blew my mind too.But not for music. Interior  is fuckin AWESOME and there was many really good looking girls
Looking at the comments here confirms what I've suspected for a while, which is that people who camp out in the left lane are responsible for a lot of the road rage that occurs on US freeways.  I'd be very curious to know what percentage of freeway accidents occur because of this.  I imagine it's a bit hard to pin down because such accidents often do not involve the slow driver, but rather the fast (and enraged) driver who is attempting to pass.  I wonder if there are any statistics on freeway accidents in states where this law is actually enforced systematically.
I don't really care what editor people use (unless I have to work with you, then I care very much that you use an editor that *you're productive in* and respects the project's coding conventions).  I was pointing out the inappropriate usage of sudo:   $ whoami  user  $ pwd  /home/user  $ echo "foo" &gt; ~/file  $ cat ~/file  foo  $ sudo cat ~/file  foo  (ba)sh does tilde-substitution before passing the args to sudo, so in this example sudo is unnecessary (unless your ~/.profile isn't owned (or at least writable) by you, but if that's the case, you've got bigger problems).  tl;dr: *whoosh*
You almost had my upvote until the past 2 sentences. 
This breaks my heart. I am divorced, my ex and I came to a agreement for him to take our daughter to Vegas, he ended up kidnapping her, but I got her back. 
I got cropdusted on the couch today...2300 for a fart machine
I've seen this movie.  Politician tries to garner youth vote by making comments that are seemingly pro-legalization.  Politician gets elected.  Politician laughs off the idea of legalization and pokes fun at the very people who elected him in the first place.
**R E F R A C T I O N**
once again i learn more and more from reddit everyday.
That's pretty funny, I never really took notice before.
Twilight, when it first came out... though I was a fifteen year old girl, so it makes me feel a little bit better about it
That, or they just aren't homosexual. Either way, the guy has 15 upvotes so his theory is proving accurate.
Haha, it's good to know my randomness doesn't go unnoticed.  The heiny was a little sore when sitting, but recovered quickly. Luckily, I didn't take any many more stair slides after that.
rescue rangers go to space?
Why not just link directly to the woot site?
I've been looking for these comics for a while. Thanks for posting it.
I think that was correct, but reddit has become reddit &amp; digg. It's obvious in how much people ignore the rules on when to vote, or am I just becoming more cynical?
Graphics don't mean shit in a simulation.  Jesus christ if you have time to notice the graphics you are the dude 5 seconds off the pace in last place.   Nascar Racing 2003 is still considered the best Nascar simulation ever, its foundation is what became iRacing.  There's a reason it is still played today with a massive following and EA's Nascar games continue to suck, and its not the graphics. 
I think there were a few people trying to get together at a bar a few nights ago, don't forget about /r/atlanta
Warning: Some pics are shit. I didn't make the gallery, someone I know did and they suuuck.
Good for you!   You've already done all that's necessary. I'd say go enjoy your life and don't worry about it anymore. 
this shouldn't be downvoted. Honestly, most of the hate towards Lebron is just bandwagoning. I have friends who have never seen a single NBA game talk about how much they hate Lebron.
Umm, the reason?  at 12 years old the demand for replacement parts is pretty high.  what makes a car a target?  well lots of factors, ease of entry, the demand for parts and the speed at which the parts can be fenced.  So, sadly I'm afraid it isnt coming back.  I wish I had better news for you.  I mean I really hope somehow you beat the odds and it gets found but I'm not overly optimistic.
lol. He's denying reality again. U-233 can and has been used to make a bomb.   Is there nothing you can't get wrong?!  P.S. What happened to your cries for civility? :)
came here looking for this "Gap": [NSFW](http://images.phapit.com/uploaded_pics/phap1151.jpg)
His shitty comic got no upvotes.
got it to install, but the game crashes at the end of level 3.  The game disappears when I try to change any graphics options.  Also cant figure out how to hook up my xbox controller to my laptop...
Yeah the slowness is something I forgot to mention but I can allow that due to it being beta, it's the rest which bothers me.
One more outlet for insecturity to build a case against their mate.
Well, he does look like a sexual predator in some of those pics.
Yeah, this is a pain in the butt. I set the game to Peaceful and then back every time I enter the Nether just to clear out a few ghasts. Otherwise, you get 40-50 ghasts on the screen.
My other friends are the same way.  We have fun.  A lot of my husband's friends' wives are bitches.....I don't care what they think.
Only if they pass my first and only question.  HIV, yes or no?
"guurrrfff, i wunt 2 seez duh saem face wiff new word on it, DOWNBOTE"
I agree completely, and have been looking for solutions for a while, but I think it's probably built into Chrome's core functionality - this is why I use Firefox whenever I can.
Wow... nothing left to the imagination...
Fuck You
W0rm.... did you follow me here? haha
I shaved my leg for this post.  http://i.imgur.com/NYDpm.jpg
Ha ha, oh wow.
amen sister
How long before you prostitute yourself to pay the bills?
Damn I wish you hadn't used a throwaway, I would love to Friend your real account. 
These days? I just started up Deus Ex: Invisible war a few days ago and maaaan, the lighting is bad.   Yes, I know, Invisible War and all that, but c'mon.
What are you saying, of course all cops are corrupt.
&gt; Do you have any examples of misogynistic comments  That "bitches love smiley faces" video that got popular gave a tremendous number of Redditors *carte blanche* to now use "bitch" in place of "woman".
Tom Allen has a disturbing amount of time on his hands.
I just own a bank, so you know, I just take everyone's gold
When I get home tonight, I'll ask him who it belongs too. And the Wii too. That will be interesting.
Luke 16:23-24
Amazing flow, and his voice is one of the most unique instruments in the genre, but too much of what he says is nonsense. Very rarely does he tell a story.
thats perfect, it leaves time for the ritual so the second the pizza gets there your ready!
I read the book of Mormon, twice because I was dating this crazy hot girl whom was mormon. But, I'm not mormon, catholic and old testament too. It was impossible for me to buy into any of it, I know one book for another book but I'm happy with my brainwashing and taking on another one was just too much work.  
Downvoted into oblivion!  Awesome picture.
This whole "I'm sorry you're bitter" line is the precise thing Christians do when they get owned in a debate.  They'll say something condescending like "I'll pray for you" or some other insincere bullshit.  Don't worry about me, I wasn't dumb enough to get married or have kids.
Check out this from another artilce.  (Posted this also to another reply) &gt;The new Wikileaks revelations, purporting to be from U.S. State Department cables and published by several Western papers, raised questions about the future of the relationship between China and North Korea described in the past as being as close as "lips and teeth."  In one cable by the U.S. ambassador to Seoul, a top South Korean official is described as saying in February that some Chinese officials would not intervene if North Korea collapsed.  U.S. Ambassador Kathleen Stephens wrote that Chun Yung-woo, then the vice foreign minister for South Korea, said the younger generation of communist leaders in China would not risk new armed conflict on the Korean Peninsula, the Guardian reported.  Some analysts were skeptical.  "My personal advice is that the report has been misplaced," said Wang Dong, a professor at Peking University. North Korea is a strategic question for China, not a financial or economic one. He said they have made a mistake about China's viewpoint.  
I never gave up... cheeking every week... Thanks guys. Christmas came early this year!
LEGALIZE IT!!! :)
i am using a very old version of internet explorer so your CSS tricks do not stop me.
You haven't seen the finale, huh?
Booyakasha! Dentists' are like car mechanics, politicians, and lawyers. You can't trust them. They'll fuck something up in your teeth so that you come back after a month.
Sounds like Sonic CD, but I could be wrong...
How do you happen to come across hollow point bullets without realizing due to "shitty luck"?
I'm diggin' #6
Or doesn't want to, and is just trying to make it clear that they are the "Party of NO".
"I wished to have an orange for a head" will now be my answer to most questions.
TIL that the OP has no spouse or kids.
Who lives in a pineapple under the sea?/SPONGEBOB SQUAREPANTS! Absorbent and yellow and porous is he/SPONGEBOB SQUAREPANTS!
Am I the only one who's been periodically refreshing this thread hoping the answer would be put up? :/
how about your friend there? Do you think your gf would be "open" to getting stretched by his something-bigger?
But, God is omnipresent, Mr. Gruff! Problem?
clearly, you've never read the Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy.
Yeah, my dad called me when they found out.  They're frazzled but otherwise OK.  That kid's gonna have the best Thanksgiving holiday story ever.  
The spring was the wettest on record. Not good in some ways because swinging from not enough rain to record levels so quickly is a sign that the energy levels in the atmosphere are higher than in the past. Global warming is real and we can see the effects.
Yep: http://ind.pn/eCeQwO  He mentions Gadaffi, Khomeini and a few others that it's been used on.
Got drunk, we fucked.
Nice dude, thats crazy. But yeah, if you get married thats cool, if not im sure you guys will be pretty well off when her father dies and the money is hers.
The screencap must have made the flags look off - my bad...  http://imgur.com/k9rdm.png
it's determined by three things, actually.  supply, demand, and inflation.  when any of these changes, prices fluctuate.  i include the price of bandwidth in the category of inflation.  as bandwidth increases, costs must go up to accomodate.  if supply is infinite (like diamonds and downloads) then the price defers to demand and inflation.  just like if demand is infinite than price defers to supply (like gas).  enjoy your basic economics course.
One on the edge of the Universe and one in the center. Indestructible universe. You're welcome.
One of my favorite things about Reddit is its inherent, quick self-correction. You'll have people be asshole and those people get smacked down/downvoted pretty quickly. Even if they're given a little room to run, pow, they're not runnin' for long.  Reddit is nothing if not self-correcting.
Those damned politicized highway engineers 
erm... is that the word a "new" word? i don't happen to have it in the 3 dictionaries lying around my house (including the one my imac has already)
&gt;It is -3C when I walked into the clinic to get my STD test.  At first I thought, "wow, cold."   Then I realized it was in Celsius. 
I'm convinced she's for real, though I'm not super close to her (sister of a buddy).   She kinda got defensive about it, and her closer friends seemed genuinely (if not condescendingly) concerned.
pretty sure it's decidedly known that the decision makers of the reddit realm decide to partake in the consumption of cannabis so it's probably not a coincidence, but actually exactly what you're meant to see. DEAR ADMINS VERIFY I KNOW YOU LURK HITHER !
If you want.
You know what? I have no idea what the hell you're saying
Like the comment, not a fan of the pick though.  C'mon United.
I dont think assasination went out (The pellet shooting umbrellas were as recent as late 1980's). They just got more sophisticated, the best assasination is an assasination that does not look like one. It affords high degree of 'plausible deniability'.  Here are [two](http://www.oilempire.us/wellstone.html) that [smell of fish](http://buelahman.wordpress.com/2008/05/14/deborah-palfreys-911-conspiracy-connection/) all the way to hell.
Those images are terrible.  I clicked one and then spent too long finding the image.  I swore I'd never do that again but after a few months tried again...RAGE
Did that just happen? Mah god, you must really be some sort of *ubermensch*, holy crap! Getting nerd dates over the goddamn intertubes and in this of all threads.   I suppose now I have to get a haircut and start calling you my archnemesis. 
As near as I can tell from the Constitution, the English convention used to be to capitalize all nouns. Am I correct that this is still the case with German? 
Thanks, I think I will try that out.
Ah. I have a hard time being that cynical. But that's just probably my Midwest naivety. I feel like she might have seen my North Dakota license plates and saw me as an easy target. I guess I'll find out soon enough.
Nah, then it's time for the "God Hates 'God Hates Fads' Fads" t-shirts.
a.author[href$="/s0crates82"]:after {content: " (2003 Yamaha FZ1)"}  Neat.
Another fantastic quote.
Don't you mean Dr Pepper?!
The 'CIA' basis
Yeah, I think seeing George Lopez makes me turn the channel faster, but I can't think of anyone else.  Maybe that punchable guy on the State Farm commercials.
*But when a long train of abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same object evinces a design to reduce them under absolute despotism, it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such government, and to provide new guards for their future security.*  Thomas Jefferson, Declaration of Independence
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E7MdaVrF1Io&amp;playnext=1&amp;list=PLE0823A54BA6EFFE3&amp;index=2#t=5m20s
That's not all I suggested by a long shot. Read the whole thing. I suggested making lists about what makes you happy and what you want so that you can get clear on what that is. I suggested getting yourself out of situations that make you miserable and going for what makes you happy. How you do that depends entirely on your situation.  You can either get rid of the shitty things that you're capable of getting rid of and go for the things you can get that make you happy, or you can nitpick posts on reddit. If you have methods that work better for you, use them.  The main point is to get off ones ass and change things rather than sit and bitch.
As far as I can tell from Google (I haven't visited Cairo in at least two or three years) they don't have a grocery store right now.  The people probably buy bread and milk from the gas station and make trips to nearby larger towns for groceries when necessary. It seems like that would leave room for opening a small grocery store, but I'll point out that people constantly try to fill niche needs in this area and end up going out of business.  I've seen innumerable restaurants and consignment shops come and go, and even four or five small grocers.  Oddly enough, the one really solid type of business:  fast food.
Menzoberranzan - House Baenre please!
What just happened
VB.net?  I'm so sorry....
On some levels they won't even rage quit, they will wait till the next round, get themselves killed then call you all terrible names and rage quit.
You have opened the eyes of many blind people; you, sir, are a hero
tl;dr
Relevant: http://www.atheistcartoons.com/wordpress/wp-content/uploads/2009/06/unholy_trinity3.jpg
Meh. You tried to engage him but he retaliated like a child. I think the least of his problems is understanding the significance of IJ.   I keep struggling with starting HoL. I keep hearing the "style over substance" argument and it's pretty much why I haven't picked it up, that and that I have a giant pile of books beside my bed that I haven't started yet.   Also, speaking of IJ, only 4.5 months left before the Pale King comes out!
[&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; ](http://www.google.com/imgres?imgurl=http://www.glamourvanity.com/images/breaking-dawn-bill-condon.jpg&amp;imgrefurl=http://www.glamourvanity.com/spotlight/will-bill-condon-helm-breaking-dawn-movies/&amp;u)
Turns out one of the new characters for the PC version was Gabe Newell himself, but he took up the entire screen when played as, and was unplayable.
I walk past a similar one (it looks also like an effing spider but it is painted white). The other day I saw and old lady going towards it, and when she passed by
chickpeas = garbanzo beans
Please, hold your applause.
The bill mostly applies to *facilities*, and the definition of "facility" excludes farms.  Farms are almost wholly exempt from the provisions (except dairies in some cases). &gt;Applying those same costly regulations to the local farmer who sells his beef to 100 people at the local farmers market once a week is an entirely different matter.  It's a produce bill, it doesn't impact beef -- beef is still under the USDA, not the FDA.
Facebook, its like a marketing department for stupid.
WAHAHAH WAHAHAH WHAHAHAHHAHA its not fair mount_pleasant deletes his username BWAAAHAHAHHAHHAHAH!!!!!! Bet this is why ur friend zoner slut bitch girly cunt turned u doen - she wanted a real man, not a cry baby!!!!!!!
Same with traditional Pork pies with the jelly surounding the meat.
This is better than the OP.
and your divorce would end up costing a lot more than $10k. Seriously, you've been with this girl for only six months... that's literally *nothing.*  My 15 year old brother has been in a relationship longer than that, and no WAY is he ever gonna marry this girl!  Here's what you do--ask for the check, and if he rats you out to the girlfriend, tell her you only wanted the check to expose what he was doing behind her back. You literally can't lose!
City of Angels, California
I find it amazing that people would throw away a murder weapon (rather than simply trying to clean it) but wouldn't throw away a hard drive, instead trying to sanitize it by cleaning the cache or some other stupid shit. 
Why does this make me so sad?
at first I was just like ugh this itches!! but now I kinda love it haha.
God bless you for correcting the "it's".
this will not work in the us
yeah, it's all so ironic! crazy ironic!
Well, all politicians are absolute meatheads, I'm just looking for a system that doesn't blatantly pander to the dumbest percentile of the population while the rest of the society is left holding the bag wondering who raped them in the ass this time. As long as it's not as corrupt as Eastern Europe, and not as retarded as the States, I think I'll get along with it. 
It would not just be "inconvenient", or do you not understand how repressed people were living under soviet style communist states? Additionally a soviet sphere of influence is only one factor in my comment. The amount of American, Japanese, and most likely Soviet deaths would have been massive. Not to mention that had the Soviets invaded, it would be pretty hard for the U.S to tell them to stop. The Red Army probably would have not stopped til they got to Tokyo.
I thought I was in for a long night but then the first explosion happened...2 minutes later I came. 
you are AWESOME.
That game SUCKS!  None of the guns do anything different from one another and same with all the melee weapons!  Do not waste your time with L4D2!
It's
I really like the AK. Reports of its inaccuracy are greatly exaggerated. Find a good-quality AK-47, maybe @ http://www.ioinc.us/   ...or wherever, and enjoy.
Yet both will prevent scurvy!
Liefx never said anything about harassing /r/athiesm... and the reason most Athiests don't head over to check up on how Christianity works is because they already have been subjected to many Christian values throughout their life.
No, I lack the necessary skills.
That's because there's no "passing lane" in Ohio according to any driver's ed course there. What the sign says is what it means, Everyone challenges it by 5 mph and the cops don't usually care, 9 to 10 mph and you usually start getting tickets, and if your car can't go the speed limit then move over.  Edit: of course their are old people, the fact that West Virginia is right next to it and you'll get ticketed for going 1 mph over the speed limit there, and that some people are just jack-asses that don't need to travel 20 mph over the limit in a residential zone and we happen to be in front of them :)
This is just about perfect. It's crazy how different it is North and South of Main St. I'm happy I live on the South side of Main.
Wage &amp; price controls, abandoning the gold standard, negotiating with Commies, ridiculously high tax rates on the rich (90%+)...  Yeah, Nixon wouldn't make it in Reagan's Republican party.
As a firefighter, I can tell that you are one and would like to say that everyone at my house lol'd over this comment. 
LOST
YES! I have been waiting for this to come out on DVD for years!
reddit.com: outrage first, fact checking much, much later.
lets send the scientists to meet with obama
Doesn't work for embedded, most of us play vids embedded into Reddit.  Just sayin'.
I had problems with Steam caused by this that took me a fair while to properly diagnose. That having been said, I can enable it when needed.
Goodness, this is gorgeous. 
I'm interested in why 65 percent of human dog bite fatalities are caused by pitbulls. Are you saying it has nothing to do with them being selected for aggression?
Zero rings and Barkley wasn't like he is on tv during his playing days
perhaps we upvote this not 'cause it's true, but 'cause we want to believe it  FOREVER ALONE  
So 6.44 picoHitlers per word? Worth every penny.
Yeah it will block the ads but for me the ad holding page sticks for ages before ticking over to the news article.
I was right with you right up until "not so much skepticism." If I gave you a peice of dog droppings and told you that eating it would be beneficial to your health, would you eat it? Why not? ...     Skepticism is a good thing, for without it, we would all be dead from stupidity.
done. Thanks for the pro-tip. 
Hurray! Hannity and his friends are hypocrites! As if we didn't know this already. Preaching to the choir much?
MOAR - http://imgur.com/Y6SrI
I like all my jobs :) 
There's no such thing as a college football championship duh. 
THIS JUST IN:  [Generalissimo Francisco Franco is still dead.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Generalissimo_Francisco_Franco_is_still_dead)
I think you might be blowing that a little out of proportion. 
www.hostgator.com
When you install a new launcher, it resets the default launcher properties, so you just hit home and select which one you want. To reset it, just go into App Manager and clear the defaults of the current launcher.
you took the words oudda my thoughts
I wonder if the Swedish vikings would have liked videogames.
because it shows how far we've come.....................
I think the problem is that it's not face to face.  If we imagined that each post was a statement in a face to face conversation, I doubt things would get as heated.  That being said, I'm kind of a douche on reddit, but only because I like to argue.  It's all in good spirits.
Kind of like this? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ra0mWdnwptg
this guy is doing it right
I was 9 when this movie came out. I ran away from home for the afternoon and walked down Lankershim Blvd to a theater where it was showing. Towards the end of the movie, when the invisible monster was making it's appearance, I was too scared to watch anymore and so I had to get up and leave. 54 years ago and it seems like yesterday.  Yeah, I know. I'm old. But as long as I keep getting older, I'm in fairly good shape.
it says "East gate"
I feel the same way. I don't post much anymore because people can be very condescending to you for even a typo or just genuinely adding to the conversation. 
Isn't that the joke from a comedian that was on Conan?  Actually that IS that joke.
Where's all the blood from the circumcision?
I dunno, I thought the joke fell flat. 
Development mode more likely :)
And what you said is exactly what i meant when i said that world peace came with a cost but didn't want to go into.  "world peace" doesn't mean NO military conflicts, it just means the major powers of the world will no longer go to war aiming for each others destruction. As to the rest of your views, i agree with them, but it brings me back to my question, what are the alternatives? we all would love and hope for equality of lifestyle around the entire world over night, but how realistic is that?  I choose to be optimistic about humanity and believed that these people who leads the world financially will find the need to help their fellow man once they've realized that more money is pointless to them, much like what bill gates is doing.  Was he always a philanthropist? no, his tactics to acquiring such fortunes are as questionable as any financial institution.  But once he reached a higher level psychological development in his later years, he is one of the top contributors to help improve the 3rd world. I like to look at humanity optimistically and think of the current situation as a transition period.  Is the most ideal form of global system we have? no, is it better than it ever was since the world was entirely mapped out? yes.  Of course there is problems with people and states claiming their own interest, but compare to pre ww2 and during ww2, it's infinitely better.  This shows me that humanity is progressing in the right direction.  There is going to be people being exploited, but that's exactly why we need an educated population to point that out and call states or organization on their activities.  
Web search engines have existed for 17 years. Google itself is over 13 years old.  It is quite possible she didn't realize how old he actually was, not that the concept of the lack of google was beyond her.  Edit: Yahoo did exist when he was in high school according to his what the op has said.
You will do fine. Like every mom on this planet.   Many people here suggested waiting for the 2nd trimester to tell anyone. I suggest telling family and friends now: if there is a miscarriage you will be sad and if nobody knows why, nobody can help you mourn.  Get now sleep, 5-9 months from now you won't get enough uninterrupted sleep.
Ecuador
Damn dude, take reddit with a grain of salt, if someone claims to be more "right" than me, then fine, I make them site a source, if not its all just opinion.
Be provocative. Be organized.
tamagachi.
I'm a recently medically retired combat vet myself, and could've used more information than was availed to me. So I figured this would help. 
How did he have it spelled? How else is there to think to spell that?
\* in South Korea
Imagine the look on the cops face when Mr. Grant asked if he had change for a 50,   and saw the same face!
I guess he finished that album. Time for some R&amp;R.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BBzI_1rTKzs  (oh god is right) It just gets worse. Made in 2005 right before graduating high school. No drugs, I promise. It's in my basement.
Debeers propaganda.
Satire, actually.  And it's sufficiently extreme in its satire that it has invoked Poe's Law.
Still.  No reason to have loser friends on Facebook.  Tell them to go screw.
Nothing too Fancy by Umphrey's Mcgee
What's the whole situation with Dominique Strauss-Kahn? Wasn't he looking to go for the Presidency?
We have a list of classic "lines" that live on.  No one else will get these jokes but family. So when we're out, you'll hear one of us say "I'm not paying for YOUR orange juice!" and laugh.  It's one of those "you had to be there" things. ;)   On one hand - if it is a friend - you cringe and walk away.  When it's family, they tend to show up unexpectedly and claim to be related, despite your feverish denials!  
Popped colars bro, popped colars.
smelly old wasp
Thanks for posting this, I, like you, am well keen to learn Swedish but there is nowhere around here that teaches it, in or out of uni.  Will check out some of the links posted by others.
Well if neither of them would know that they're being watched what does it say about the quality of the PI's you hired?
That is curious, I had never noticed that. There are interesting things of note about the genealogies, they skip several generations, and mention women. Personally, I don't think either one is flat out wrong, but neither is completely accurate by today's standards. IMHO Jesus was probably indeed related to all the individuals listed and in line to the throne of David. I've never been one to say the Bible is inerrant, because it does have it's discrepancies in it's current form as we know.
I know it's not personal.  I just think it's illogical.
The act of one man isn't indicative of the entire party. 
I'm downvoting you for bitching about getting downvoted.
tl;dr - OP is a douche.
WORST CHANGE EVER - the hell, i didnt get an approval email!
Maybe she got over it.  But your abomination is somebody else's lifestyle - who are you to judge?
Probably not. More to the point, I wonder if he would call for death penalty for someone who leaked to him hundreds of thousands of classified documents, some of which perhaps damaging to national security. Again, maybe not, I don't know.
I love polyrhythms, I really want to learn the odder ones, like 2:5, 3:5, 2:7, 3:7,5:7, etc....
Farmers were largely exempt even before the amendment.  The amendment is aimed toward small *facilities*.  
One nation under ... CCTV
did you ever figure out what you are going to do on tuesday? 
Your tone pretty much sums up the prior poster's comment. Is there something inherently wrong with trying to learn where others are coming from, even if you don't agree with them? It's to be commended, not dismissed. 
I had to put up with Antietam cable for a summer in scenic Hagerstown, MD.   It was terrible. Latency was basically random, making online games unplayable. Advertised speeds were not in numbers, just "faster than dialup," and that seemed like a wild boast, Netflix was unwatchable during prime time.  I was begging for Comcast to come in and fight on my behalf. Antietam cable, incidentally, is owned by one John Hager, descendant of the town founder. Maybe that had something to do with why no one else can get in, hard to know.
I find these anti-Free Will arguments  totally rely on procrusteanism.
sure, why not?
Here is a forum full of [transformations](http://forum.bodybuilding.com/showthread.php?t=108359701)
I like Scott Lynch - the Gentlemen Bastard series - "Lies of Locke Lamora" and "Red Seas Under Red Skies" so far.  "Name of the Wind" isn't a series, yet, but it's one of the best fantasy books I've read in a long, long time.  I think R. Scott Bakker's Prince of Nothing series ("The Darkness That Comes Before" et al.) is brilliant. It's big and it's dense but its as close to "literature" in fantasy as I've come across.  I'd also add a vote for Sanderson's Mistborn and Abercrombie's First Law Trilogy. His followup stand alone was good too.
I have to warn people thinking about purchasing this game though. It's not Call of Duty. You actually have to work as a team in order to win. If you can accept that responsibility then its a blast. 
i want an iphone
Subliminal Suzuki advertising.
Rice, beans and carrots in egg-drop soup. You will need some chicken broth and cornstarch though. Otherwise, just soup.
Isn't this some convenient shit.
What are those particular university apartments called? I go on the site and I see a bunch but I don't know which ones are the ones on the east side :\
I currently live close-ish to Sheridan (near Oakville Place), so if you have any more general questions about life here I would be happy to help.
Welcome to club reddit. Where people give a shit about grammer and dance your' ass off!
I'm fairly certain I would laugh at any rendition of this comic...
Watching now! Thanks!
Em um encontro como nunca visto antes, no dia 24/11/2010, o Presidente Lula se reuniu com blogueiros  em um debate transmitido via internet.
Just like federal and state laws, scientific laws are meant to be broken.  There are many more ways for this to go wrong than just quantum computers.  Parallel processing (ie: botnets) and imperfect/fuzzy logic are just two examples of ways to circumvent the cryptography in it.  Even if you can't 'crack the code', you can still create DOS attacks to cripple the system, again relying on those botnets or simply filtering it at the network level.  It's being placed on the users computers, so no matter how much security you put around it, it is ultimately under their control (if they can figure out how to control it).  Being on the internet means that just that many more users can control it.  What would happen if a botnet of 50k+ servers joined the service, waited patiently, and then simultaneously corrupted all the data that they held?  How much of that data could be recovered from the rest of the 'servers'?  Distributed backups only work when you control a significant majority of the servers.
&gt;For us it's buckshot, slugs, and muzzle-loaders at close to mid range, mostly in the woods. The same with me. I've always hunted from tree stands, but a lot of my friends go the buckshot and dogs route. At least the buckshot is a little more forgiving when you're trying to lead a running deer.  The main problem I've seen with buckshot is when people try to take long shots when the small pellets have just run out of oomph, or how bad they shred up the meat.
Right, but it might me he won't bring out the usual tripe about atheists just 'hating/being angry with god'
Well done for your race result! I'm still working on getting below 20 minutes for my 5k :) Bit to go yet! I'm doing a roughly 22 minute 5k at the moment although I haven't actually run just a 5k in about 6 or 7 months, I'm basing that time on my 10k results. Haven't seen your blog before but I think I'll be subscribing.
If you sit too long without moving your legs you can get a pulmonary embolism and die.
I could try to fix it for you. I have never done a screen but i have replaced a few HDs in mac laptops and only had a few screws left over when i put them back together.
If I wasn't American I would haul my ass to Cuba ASAP.
This comes up every single year on Reddit. Yes Reddit, in Catalonia there is a guy who poops. He is El Caganer.
Actually it says Q4 2011, but don't count on it.
I'm not arguing that simulated child pornography should be made illegal, but proclaiming it a solution to child sexual abuse seems logically absurd.  As for the analogy to car theft and murder, I'm not referring to games like GTA encouraging normal kids to turn to a life of crime, I'm referring to people who are actively contemplating these crimes. Would a synthetic alternative quell those desires or feed them?  I'm not dismissing anything here, I'm just raising questions.
lol, yes. See, when YOU type PixelCookieisagay, it shows to us as *****************
Wow, if it ever happens to me, I wont be in shock anymore, thanks for that. Glad she handled it well.
When I get home from work today I plan on making the following revisions to GM status for our club.  Remove: Inapprope, Wakenbakeyou  Add: I Ear Pancakes, Majupra  Both people that I am revoking their GM status have been inactive for quite some time.  The two I am adding have my full confidence of not going to go crazy with the powah.  The main responsibility that a GM needs to do is just check our club's invites once a day to see if anyone has asked to join and if there are, accept their request.  Last night we reached our max player count once again in the club so I couldn't accept two invites at the time.  Will go thru tonight and remove inactive club members once again who haven't played any games so we can accept these new people.  If we get to a point where we have too many peeps, I will be inquiring from club members as to what they would like to do.  Most likely we will form a second club and every now and then we could play games against each other for fun.
Community norms and enforcement measures have the potential to solve the 'tragedy of the commons' (see common-pool resource theory) but have been largely unsuccessful in the United States. I found it interesting that some of the largest proponents of community-based management were economically motivated; loose management policies are often easier to ignore/manipulate.
The implied question was who would be "right for America", not who the corporatist interests were going to throw their money and influence at in 2012.
I'd say confront her with your discomfort, and if she doesn't offer on her own ask her to not spend one on one time with him anymore because it makes you uncomfortable how little you knew about this new friend.  If she insists you are being unreasonable, or if for whatever reason the situation continues or gets worse then you have to realize she isn't willing to take precautions with one friend for you.  It is not unreasonable for one of you to ask the other to be completely open about a friendship nor to ask that the other not spend time one on one with a friend of the opposite sex (that is how almost literally every cheating situation begins). If she cares less about your feelings than hanging out with this guy you should dump her.  Things will not be getting better.
35th and Portland is hardly ghetto.  It's not great, but there are much worse parts of even South Minneapolis (Philips for example).
Many people on Reddit seem to think the Reddit community as a whole has high standards. In reality, Reddit's standards are just as low (or high, depending on your viewpoint) as those of most other online communities.
My favorite is someone who gave me a Charlie Brown mini tree.  It's on my coffee table now :)
i wear my sfu shirt and uOttawa shirt around ubc all the time. Likewise when I'm there. Only a few frat boys ever care to comment. We go to school for school. I guess in the USA the rivalries come from sports teams. 
Should governments pursue anything? 
What about Trebuchet Tim?
So If I offered to give you $10,000 for absolutely no reason at all, you'd reject because you "don't like to be toyed with?"  This is why being a "man of conviction" is retarded nonsense.
This is like the fifth variation of this I've seen. It's no longer creative and it's getting old very quickly. Just my $0.02.
Shouldn't a well designed font be overused? 
Seriously, helleborus has a point sheeple. Do you know the OP? He's been a redditor for 0 days, I doubt many, if any, of you know him.    Yet several people have decided to trust him implicitly and post their own reviews slamming the company. What if the OP was the crazy ex boyfriend of the owner? Instead of sitting home drinking away the pain of a breakup he decided to make a thread about how the company sucks. And lo and behold, the angry masses descend to yelp with their own fake reviews that will pretty much guarantee anyone smart enough to google the company will steer clear of doing business with them. This business is likely someone's livelihood, but a few people apparently feel it's ok to potentially destroy it because "someone on da intarwebz said they wuz bad."    I'm not questioning the OP's intentions or honesty here. He asked for advice, not a pitchfork waving mob. I'm questioning why some people don't stop to think for 10 seconds before jumping on the e-vigilante bandwagon.
I didn't donate any money but I still read the AMA. Suck on that, do-gooders!
&gt;He boils it down to the base assumption that increased CO2 = 1.5-4.5C change in temperature. But why? He just says that the IPCC gives that number.  The evidence for this is expanded upon in the IPCC report. Or a shorter version is [here](http://www.realclimate.org/index.php/archives/2007/08/the-co2-problem-in-6-easy-steps/).  &gt;I guarantee that there are unpredictable variables that we aren't even aware of yet when it comes to the behavior of our climate as a whole.  There probably sure as hell are. All the more reason why we probably should *not* perform a live planetary-wide experiment with it to see what happens.  &gt;Would it be too far-fetched to suggest that plants might adapt to this 'new' level of CO2, and quickly become mega-flora  Possibly, but that is not the concern. The concern is the disruption to economies from massive refugee situations.   &gt;FYI, the hockey stick came from a model too. Do you really think that makes data correct? Just, 'coming from a model'?  No, the hockey stick comes from measuring temperature proxies. A model is a way of predicting future events. There is no guarantee that a model is correct, but unless you want to build a second earth to run experiments on, then what else do you suggest?
Was unaware. As you can see, it was posted on facebook.
I'm not sure if anything specifically made me become a nudist? I've always had an aversion to clothes, since a very, very young age. My earliest 'nude' memory comes from when I was fifteen and my mother told me that I couldn't lounge in my room naked all the time. I asked her why, and she answered, '...well, not with the door open, at least!' So I closed the door.
&gt;Well-being is the cumulative measure of economic prospects, environment, physical and mental health, education, recreation, leisure time, and social belonging for a person.  Sort of.  But different cultures may gives different weightings to the various aspects you mention above. Some cultures for example may greatly value "economic freedom" whereas other are more inclined to limit economic freedom for the "greater good" of the society.   &gt;How else would you define it for empirical testing?  The concept of well-being is so value-laden with cultural baggage I think its a real challenge to empirically test or measure it.   &gt;Yes, and how is this relevant?  Because the US is ultimately responsible for the appalling social conditions within Saudi Arabia by propping up that vile regime. The people of the region generally despise the corrupt monarchy and never chose for the Saud family and their Salafi allies to rule over them. 
Graphs, statistics, and sources make up an info-graphic. This is just Who Trivia with some pictures. 
I have a friend who does Pekiti-Tirsia.  He took his knife and and iced a Krav Maga guy to prove their knife disarms are worthless in real life.  Krav Maga got fucked
The "live" examples at the bottom are pretty impressive. Redraws are very sluggish in Firefox 3.6 though. Surprisingly, Minefield doesn't behave much better. Opera runs better and Chrome (dev channel) is pretty smooth.  Hope stuff like this will be also hardware accelerated in the future.
Don't forget to toss some of your hard-earned money in that can as well 
If that isnt creepy ehough. Hyenas are known to actually dig up buried bodies and eat them. 
awesome fort dude. you should crosspost to /r/forts ! Love the tie dye.
Works fine for me. Want me to recruit you?
Hartman: "And we love our beloved corps ladies,"   Dwarfs: "Semper fi, do or die, gung ho gung ho gung ho."   Hartman: "What makes the grass grow?"   Dwarfs: ["Blood, blood, blood."](http://www.entertonement.com/clips/gyhljhwshj--What-makes-the-grass-growR-Lee-Ermey-Full-Metal-Jacket-Gunnery-Sergeant-Hartman-Marines-)  Hartman: "What do we do for a living, ladies,"   Dwarfs: "Kill, kill, kill."   Hartman: "I can't hear you."   Dwarfs: "Kill, kill, kill."  Hartman: "Bullshit, I still can't hear you."   Dwarfs: "Kill, kill, kill."
Oh, are they moving?
I have to agree with the 1st point. 10.3 Trillion stars per person on earth in just our observable portion of the universe. ([source](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=number+of+stars+in+universe+divided+by+number+of+people+on+Earth&amp;asynchronous=false&amp;equal=Submit)). It's hard not to believe that some other planet falls in the same Goldilocks Zone that we do (if that is even a necessity for life to exist at all.) 
I think she *did* marry him for [his cock](http://i.imgur.com/88yhg.jpg)
that kid is a total dick
You're right, you could not play after finishing the game until the expansion came out that let you play the "After game"
A good deal on a 4L of milk here in Halifax is $5.39. (Costco) At the grocery store, it's more like $6.79. I go through 8L a week. Damn!
If you are interested in pvp at all, I can set you up with my old corp who is very active and helpful in the Minmatar militia.
Brilliant musical ear... unless he had the notation? Regardless, I welcome the warm waves of nostalgia!
'A $1000 1950 tractor is more useful to me than the $35,000 2010 Kubota.'  This is too true, the idea is to add value and value lies in the marginal products of society that are no longer wanted.   Dont forget the fact that modern equipment is manafactured under a doctrine of design obselecence, so you need specific parts and specific tools to repair each component resulting in lots of 'waste metal.' Whereas 1950's and 40's post war farming equipment was probably designed to last, because they mechanized the tools of war for agriculture, thus tractors may have been built as strong as tanks. (I dont own a tractor)  Mechanization of farming is what has allowed us to feed so many people, I believe that fertilizer can be made safer and more effective still and the same applies to farming equipment. These machines did not incorporate safety to individuals or environments into there design philosophy.  Thus you cause is a noble one!   In the navy they have to have a 3 in 1 machine on the ship to repair components, this can preform all the operations of a conventional metal workshop and make the parts to repair itself.  Then scrap metal becomes a valuable resource that keeps the ship going and it can fit on a bench.  Thats a big difference in design philosophy. 
The problem is inflated pricing mostly do not go to the artists themselves.  While 10 for a CD, maybe .25-.50 goes to the artist? There is a market pressure for the price not to be so high, but the powers that be want to have a certain level of profit.  Say someone came out with a $10 a month subsciption and you could download and listen to as much music as you wanted anywhere.  If you want to fill an ipod with itunes music it costs tens of thousands of dollars. 
no. but don't suggest that or you might be a casualty of her instability.
I was a little jealous of my friends with macs when coda came out, but not enough to make the switch. My Dell met its demise though in August on a bike tour and so I picked up a cheap netbook at walmart (bike tour, didn't want to add much weight/space). Maybe when I scrape together the cash I will pick up a macbook next year. This year is saving up for taxes because my cheating ex decided to not to pay her share of rent (or any) for the past year.
I hate when my gas is flabbered
So you're sticking your fingers in your ears, shutting your eyes, and believing what 'should' happen will...rather than paying attention to what actually does happen...?  Yup, you sure are a feminist...
Never once have I had an issue with this, and I've only bought NVidia cards.
Ever drive in the Bay Area?  Not even talking rush hour bumper to bumper, just normal daytime traffic.  You'd be wasting an entire lane if you stayed right except to pass.  It makes perfect sense on a 2 lane interstate with little traffic.  It doesn't really work in congested areas where the lane should be used to help traffic flow in general.  Granted, people should generally TRY to stay out of that left lane if it is possible, but sometimes it just doesn't matter because we're all going 60mph unless you start weaving.  
Agreed. In a thread a few days ago "need help ask here" kind of thing, I was downvoted for saying I could use any help cause I'm broke. Ugh.
I wish people would stop making fun of my OKCupid profile.
I much prefer them dumping change on the counter. It is really frustrating when they spend five minutes counting out change when I am just going to have to count it again, and I am way faster at counting change.
I apologize if the question is dumb, but, I thought the microwave would render the secret ingredient useless?
Since Apple doesn't have to stick with conventional computing methods I could see them making a computer with hybrid chipsets.  Sounds oddball, but there is nothing stopping them from hybridizing an iPad and Macbook with the release of Lion. They could have grand central dispatch (GCD) switch the binaries on applications. Bare with me here…  Apps like Safari, iTunes, finder, mail, Quicktime, address book, text editor, (standard apps) could be packaged in dual binary. So the apps can work on ARM and x86. The user doesn't see the package's contents so they wouldn't even need to see how it works to use it.  For an app like Safari: When GCD detects that all the running apps can be managed by the A4 it would basically get the programs to switch binaries at the next available chance. Then on a page reload or idle state the app could stealthily switch to the A4 version of the app. The x86 processor powers down and the whole system turns into a A4 computer with shared Storage, battery, and RAM. (I probably don't need to even mention how many days an iPad could run on a double sized battery.) When an app that needs x86 runs (like photoshop) the intel chipset kicks in and the tasks switch back to x86.  It would take some developer adoption and some minor user awareness but I think it could be implemented very well since average users just surf the internet and listen to music. Then they also have desktop computer power when needed.  In the UI area, they could have a little icon by the clock that the user clicks when they want to switch to low-power mode. A dialog pops up showing all the programs that can only run in x86 mode or can't smoothly transition to low power mode. The dialog asks if it is okay to close the x86 apps. As they close, save/save as dialogs pop up for unsaved docs.  The user could optionally switch to it and the system can automagically switch to it.
Holy shit, K-State redditors!
I'll look up the text when I get home.  Well, first off: Why is it unreasonable to accept that these people are capable of identifying themselves better than we can?  If they are capable of loving a mutually consenting adult of the same gender there's no logical reason why that person should to go through a different line to get the same legal paperwork done as heterosexual marriages.   That aside: Yes, humans usually conceive a sustainable reproductive populous but that doesn't mean individuals who don't fit the norm occur unnaturally.  Physical gender, gender identity, and sexual orientation are all aspects of our identity which accumulate in development largely outside of our control.  The crossing conception and development of gender and sexual development can yield something substantial physically, genetically, or hormonally.  It may not be typical, but it's absolutely occurs naturally.   Saving the nastiness for the last... your second paragraph makes LDS sound noble, "standing up for their beliefs isn't always easy, but it's defending family...".  Bullshit.  "Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion..." In other words, if the proposition to ban gay marriage can't be justified without religion it doesn't belong in law.  The stance and influence of LDS is a big deal because they're backing **their** moral values with material value (money) to fuel [FUD](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fear,_uncertainty_and_doubt) tactics.  Titles of some fallacious FUD tactics we can get into:  * Think of the children, they'll all turn gay!  * They're changing the definition of marriage makes yours less meaningful!  * Next thing you know I'll be able to marry my dog!  * Next thing you know I'll be able to have a second wife!  * SSC can't afford it!  * God will smite America!
Prognosis?
I think they say, Keep Right Except to Pass. Maybe I'm trippin'.
Come to my place.
Insofar as can be perceived, humans are not born with any concept of god(s) in mind, much less believing in a particular one, so . . . yes, you were born atheist.  However, you can distinguish between atheism due to flat ignorance of divine conceptions, and atheism due to evaluation of theism and religion.  Something like . . . "non-methodical" versus "methodical" atheism.
tl;dr; Treyarch supposedly called some people and got them the stop, but couldn't stop one. The story of the leaked copy is that it was bought for $50.
Some of the media and our government have mixed the words "insurgent" and "terrorist" with almost total disregard.  Perhaps there are a handful of globally connected/financed terrorists in Afghanistan and Iraq in comparison to a much larger group of insurgents.  Insurgents mainly being local militia fighters or even local warlords fighting over minor territory/political power or even simple "la resistance" means simply to fight foreign occupation.  The reason these have been merged may be due to poor journalistic responsibilities or even the attempt to justify defense contract spending.  But let me be clear that the tactics used by both are somewhat closely related and sometimes outside funding does reach local militia groups with the intentions of using them as an extension to terrorist related goals.   One thing I know is that religion is merely used as the "kicker" to justify for suicide bombings and overall terrorist related attacks. In fact statically we know that when the family of suicide bombers do not receive financial reimbursement as promised by some "organizations", the amount of recruits drop dramatically.  Political power and greed are most certainly the primary reasons for the constant the attempts to keep unrest in the middle east.  America is not the only country at play in wanting to shape the politics and future of the region.   All in all the war on terror is complicated as fuck.
My credit union, American Heritage, doesn't do this for me, which is why I've stuck with my Citizens Bank account while living in Pittsburgh (American Heritage is Philadelphia-based). Fortunately, Citizens has yet to screw me over with fees for having an account, and I actually quite like the new "no overdrafts ever" option.  I might make more use of my credit union account when I'm done with college and want loans for a nicer car or a house. My dad apparently liked it so much that he completely switched from his company's credit union to this one. Right now, I need a bank with a branch that I can actually visit and no ATM fees.  edit: Oh, and American Heritage's online banking is bad bad bad bad *bad*. This is related to not being anywhere near one of their branches.
Declare financial independence and apply for fafsa.
Don't consider them "tickets."  Think of them as what they really are.  They are awards given to a special class of people acknowledging achievements in driving excellence.   
Down south we'd just say that's one 'ugly' looking storm and leave it at that. It's not uncommon to say someone is acting 'ugly' too. Obviously, it's not a comment about aesthetics; but about malevolence.   So, you're point is fine; but you strayed a bit by describing it as some 'primal' connotation. "Ugly" in this sense merely connotes a powerful, mean, bad-looking storm. That's enough.  tl;dr/ftfy = Ugly Storm. Beautiful Picture.
larger image?
LOL I dare you to try to use that much.  You will be shut down faster than you can blink.
Killing cops really should be legal in most circumstances.
I liked the time when I would throughly enjoy Eddie Murphy films. His career went into the toilet after the Nutty Professor. /p.s. Thanks Saudi King for subsidizing emergency room care! 
&gt; Then what would you call the expectation?  A reasonable expectation supported by previous evidence.
Illustrator creates vector graphics.   Photoshop creates and edits bitmap graphics.   These are different programs with different tools altogether, though they share some basic tools (such as limited drawing capabilities in Photoshop).  High end designers who want to use your logo will always ask for it in vector art. Illustrator draws vector images.  Photoshop, on the other hand, is for editing existing images. Think about the names of these programs for example: *Illustrator* / *Photo Shop.*  **edit** chmod777 put it much better than I… I'm too slow.
Sure, I'll take a crack at it. I'll let you know if I turn anything up.
Ok. I got Swype, 8pen, SwiftKey. Swype is superior to all of them, in my opinion. 8pen is stupid and basically for show-offs, SwiftKey is nice but only if your conversations are not very varied, but Swype is faster than all of them combined (which is not hard, as 8pen is... well, 8pen).  I use swype to take lecture notes, and while SwiftKey is able to predict things for a normal text conversation, Swype gives me the power to type out basically everything the lecturer said. I type blindly. The only problem with swype is the inacurracy when it comes to typing small words like "in", "on", "of". But then again, I'm using a very old version, as the bastards did not let me sign up for beta. They should include the SwiftKey prediction to polish out those little flaws, and I'll be 110% happy.
no it wouldn't be a horrible gift.  It might not be the best gift, but the giftee might love it.
with the current quality of the show and the forgiving audience, it can only go better
 now, desktop size please? :3
How does everybody not know immediately that this is a joke?  Jesus tapdancing christ.
Hm, you've piqued my interest. I'm a senior in college trying to decide what to do with my life.  &gt; I work about 4 hours total per day  How does that work?! Good to hear the job market is good. What school did you go to? 
Do you think the majority of small business owners agree with him?  Because I would bet all the money I have that they don't.  I work for a small business and I know small business owners and I've never met a single one that said increased taxes were a good thing.  
I've been recommended this band before, but i don't think they're for me. They're not bad, they just don't seem complete to me.
You again present no evidence to substantiate your serious accusation. I hereby declare you a bloody liar, a greenwashing gas shill, a stupid and deceitful dishonest troll, who drivels unfounded accusations and smears.
That fagle is always hostile. Any caliber will get a message across. Yes, it's generally accepted that gunshot wounds from, say, 10mm or .45 does more severe damage than a 9mm round. 
My bad, I thought you were trying to say that arrays were the same as objects.
HAHAHAHA WE ARE THE INTERNETS! 
only the orange. my little brother had to eat the nasty ass purple and red. what a sucker.
Haha. It was just yesterday though, so...
Yea! I hope he doesn't get offered a huge head coaching job just yet though.
Quoting *Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows*, chapter 34: "Slowly, very slowly, he sat up, and as he did so he felt more alive and more aware of his own living body than ever before.  Why had he never appreciated what a miracle he was, brain and nerve and bounding heart?"  I'm okay with "exercise" as your answer, but I suggest you exercise *toward some goal*.  A friend of mine, formerly somewhat overweight, recently completely a marathon.  It took him 4 years to train for it, and he lost weight in the process, but in truth he doesn't really look too much different.  But he FELT like the king of the world.  He ran a freaking *marathon*.  Find a good martial arts school near you and earn your black belt.  It'll take a few years, but when your sensei hands you that belt, and you know you earned it, you'll feel different.  Or buy a bicycle and finish a century (that's a 100-mile ride organised by the League of American Bicyclists, http://www.bikeleague.org/).  It'll take a while to work up to 100 miles.  But let me tell you, when you finish your first century, and it sinks in that you rode 100 miles in one day, you'll feel like there is NOTHING you can't do.  I was plodding on the pedals for about 15 miles, but when I passed the mark on the road which meant there was one mile left, it was like I was rocket powered to the end.  I got such a rush I was ready to go out right then and do another 100.  (I actually put the bike on the rack and drove home.)  Or if that's not your thing, do something else.  Find the local chapter of Habitat for Humanity, and go help build a house.  Take a wilderness survival course, preferably one where the final weekend they drop you off in the woods alone on Saturday morning and come get you Sunday night.  Use your body to *accomplish* something.  It's not just for decorative purposes.  As a straight man, I don't see anything in what you say which suggests I wouldn't find your body decorative -- but that should be in addition to *you* finding it *useful for things*.  Go do something with your body, something amazing and awesome.  Do something that will impress *you*.
**SELL, SELL, SELL!!!**
Should have shaved the beard earlier, holds surprising weight.
Who the hell is an expert on the content of 250,000 embassy dispatches that were leaked yesterday? I mean, besides Hillary Clinton.
That's is also what it means in English
Reddit is a really accepting place so long as you agree with their blanket political and religious views. This is honestly the only problem I have with reddit... It's very hard to get into a good political discussion. Usually someone get's all pissy and holier-than-thou.   They are pretty easy to troll though. I guess that counts..
All and all. Just another prick in the wall.  Fixed
Everyone's mentioned actors and no typecast actresses.  [Michelle Rodriguez](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michelle_Rodriguez) who actually takes pride in being typecast. She plays characters she likes. She doesn't give a fuck about acting, she just wants to have fun. And she likes the single character she plays.
"Its almost like god went out of his way to hide any evidence and make it look as though it didn't happen.  Sometimes I wonder about that.  If there was absolute proof that the Book of Mormon was true, then everyone would be Mormon and there would be no need to have faith.  God wants us to have faith - to depend on him, to trust him in the face of uncertainty.  Which is why he doesn't provide proof.  Probably not the answer you were looking for, and you're probably thinking "how convenient," but it's something I've been chewing on.
For this very reason we have only lived in houses with 2 toilets.  It's a small price to pay for a happy marriage.
hello everyone,im wholesale supplier  online  Welcome to our website  =====   http://www.1shopping.us/ =======  accept paypal and free shipping   We need your support and trust!!!  Dear friends, please temporarily stop your footsteps  To our website Walk around A look at  Maybe you'll find happiness in your sight shopping heaven and earth  You'll find our price is more suitable for you.  And we shall be offer you free gift about MP4 if you more order.  =====   http://www.1shopping.us/   ========
&gt;Men want to know that their wife is attractive to other men,  I don't necessarily think this is true.  At least, not in the same way that women want their man to be attractive to other women.  
I never understood how people can recognize dogs in photos. They look so similar. Especially dogs with long/medium fur. 
Yes, totally worth it.  
yeah, well, when I encounter Gimli cracking on a school girl, I giggle. Poorly timed.
*troll face*
or find some obsidian and box in his last login point. &gt;:3
Drop Bush for Jones.  Drop Addai for Westbrook if you really want options in RB.   But if you have Peterson, Blount and Bush why are you looking for new Running Backs?
You'll definitely will need a followup if and when your friend gets fired. LOL
I tried a pun in another topic and it got downvoted, so I wouldn't recommend it.  It's dangerous.
I bet I could solve 501 murders.
I might be able to help.  1. Only the name of the band?  2. Any suggested style or starting point?
Was I the only one wondering about how cost effective their beer purchase is?
I guess not, but I doubt the masses will see my message, so it's still unwritten to the general public.
I know some websites you can use if you want to see huge crevasses ;)
I eat home cooked meals for just about every meal, and the only processed stuff is cheese and lost of malaria from the Italian deli around the corner. This is pretty much only because it's what my wife cooks.
Thanks ! I've been looking for used ones on ebay. They cost about the same these new ones do. 
GOM is planning on this. They intentionally match boxer up vs fan favorites.
&gt;I think it's pretty safe to assume that he isn't going to submit to being **enhancingly interrogated** for charity.
Buzz Killington struck when someone pointed out that the rule in question makes no sense. Also, It makes the game boring.
Meh.
I GOT A TELESKOPE
I took a semester off after my first semester of college. Problem was I went somewhere I hated, but didn't know what my other options were. In the meantime I worked a low-pay job and lived with my parents. If I had had the freedoms then that I have now (now I live on my own) I probably wouldn't have gone back. Its really nice to take a break from school, but be careful if you think there's a chance you would decide not to go back. 
Thank you brother. I am on that path... It's a hard one but I'm there. I do need to delete her FB so I stop checking it :-/...  I'm out on a mission to do better than this, and better than her. Especially better than who she is now.  And you are right about the doppleganger. She is no longer the person I knew. That person doesn't exist anymore.
thank god i saw this picture
In fact, that was pretty much it. The only other question remaining is "how much do they cost now if you can find one?"
"is a great way to ruin my afternoon."  I think having your day ruined by someone on the internet who you will never know or meet in real life is a bit much. If you care so much about what people whom you don't know think then maybe not commenting is better suited for you. I don't post much here but have been on digg for years. I've gotten into some pretty heated discussions over the years but never have I let it ruin 5 minutes of my day much less my day.   BTW I am female, and when i am in a heated discussion i can hold my own. If someone chooses to call me a cunt or bitch etc, it's water off a ducks back. It just means that i am winning, when your opponent resorts to name calling it only means he has nothing left to say. One of the reasons i like sites like this is because i can discuss various subjects and hear different points of views and opinions.   Don't let someone else's opinion effect you. Remember they are like assholes, everyone has one.   The problem is not the community, but how you let it effect you.
Apparently "mentally challenged" has fallen out of favor and now it's "developmentally delayed."  I think its a ridiculous term.  As if you wait long enough and BOOM they're going to not be mentally challenged anymore.
This is to music, right?  Did I have high school chemistry with you?  No, that's highly unlikely.  Maybe our chemistry teachers had chemistry together and now both terrorize their classes with identical chemistry mixtapes.
Aknot is disgust.
I think he does a lot of arrangements for that piano game Synesthesia, too. He's good.
Visit a few asian massage parlors, you'll get a grip on their culture.
A month?  Wow.  I didn't think it was that long.  Shows how long it's been since I watched it on Hulu.  If they were smart, they'd co-opt that whole distribution model by having their own torrents, with commercials, ready to go as soon as the cable broadcast finished.  But they're still stuck in the broadcast mindset.
**V E G E T A B L E S**
Then leak them
but what determines the extent to which we respond to our reason or our body? What do we use to choose between the two? If you say "reason" we seem to fall into the infinite regress mentioned in the article.
You'll get downvoted for it. Which is the main problem. One or two people can be douche bags. The problem is that when others call them out, they get downvoted for having thin skin or no sense of humour or being to literal or reading too much into things. EDIT: [It's not about the karma](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/ee3zj/am_i_the_only_person_who_feels_like_the_reddit/c17g6md)
I posted, but in the hopes that my friends laugh.  I doubt I will get any "U R A LSR" responses.  And now... we wait.  Edit: My husband laughed at it.  So that's a good sign that I'm married to the right person.  Edit 2: Two people have "liked" it  Edit 3: Another person likes it.  They wrote, "Horses can't talk?? I can't believe you ruined it for me! JERKHEAD"   Edit 4: My mother disappoints me.  She wrote "???"... Nope, spoke too soon.  She wrote "I admit, I laughed like crazy when I read this. I'm afraid that I understand you."
I have it, I'm going to play it, and there's nothing that you can say that will change my mind. 
And now I hate it.
Replacing "God" with "Leprechauns" is surprisingly insightful. For more fun, look at an anti-gay-marriage argument, and replace "gay" with "interracial".
[NUS' response](http://www.nus.org.uk/Global/Nick%20Clegg%20response%20-%2030%2011%2010.pdf)
I'm not a captain, I work for a living god damnit!
AND I have to watch fucking awful commercials before watching the clip too...  Yeah I feel ya.
I agree with this wholeheartedly. Before discovering Reddit, I had just assumed that most countries were as bad as we have it here in the US. I can't imagine living in a society where saying you are an atheist is not met with looks of disgust and insults. I do live in the Bible Belt, and its the only area I have experience with. So take that into consideration.
You're counting on the fact that these ET's are all going to be enlightened hyper intelligent beings.   What we may be seeing is the functional equivalent of the Antarian *Larry the Cable Guy* out zooming around in his intergalactic RV.
WTf are you talking about?
This...is...amazing...
[And a one, and a two, and a heeeeere we go...](http://fcit.usf.edu/HOLOCAUST/arts/artdegen.htm)   PS - I realize they are not the same thing, but it's the same mindset, at the very minimum.
[let me give you my view on the matter through a video by charlie brooker](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WCBGBlToWUA)
thats not very nice :(
lol i've been avoiding logging in but u changed my mind. freaking hilarious +10 internets to you
My boyfriend eats his cereal in a glass all the time, it's kind of weird.
r/ShittyAdvice at its finest.
Regarding the height, you’d say “one eighty-six” or such, not all that complicated.
Man that's awesome when you smoke mids for so long then get something really nice and its like OMG I'm super high off a little bit, scary awesome when it hits you and you realize your higher then you intended.
on my list as of now. boy are they right about the other offerings.
Hmm, correct you are. It was more likely the dagger DPS we were looking at.
The first "Bitch Please" one is PERFECT.
a.author[href$="/sschicken"]:after {content: " (2006 Yamaha FZ6)"}
yes
redditor for 10 months. upvote.
but if you really want to further develop critical thinking skills, watch a few debates: http://commonsenseatheism.com/?p=50
Nope. I just sorta stalk the new queue. That way when I see a post that's bound for the top, I can make an off topic joke and rake in the karma. It's like my own little reddit mini-game.
Do they fix these issues in an LTS release?  If not this puts me off Ubuntu in general
Which is exactly why weed should be legal.
Your neighbors have awesome taste.
Came to make this post, glad to see someone beat me to it. Please, there are enough neative things in religion that you don't need to resort to making ones up.
It's simple.  If your opinion does not agree with mine, you are clearly an idiot deserving of humiliation.  /s
Looks like a candy bar...
Sometimes it can seem like Reddit has a hivemind, but I completely understand and agree with you. My fiance got me hooked on Reddit and for the most part, people are friendly enough. My bad experiences are not because of something I've done but misunderstandings or people who just don't agree with you and BOOM, downvote. Examples are a comment I posted in a Twilight thread laughing at a magazine article interviewing Robert P. about his role as Edward and how he hated the role. Naturally, every single negative thing posted in that entire thread including mine was downvoted to oblivion by raging Tweenies. Another thread I posted a link trying to disprove the stereotypes that people have about pitbulls, but commented I would PERSONALLY never own one nor trust them around my own children. Downvoted for..who knows why, someone even called me a moron. I would suggest just not letting it get to you, since Reddit as individuals are generally smart, open-minded and kind-hearted and there's always going to be people who just either can't see the other side or are in a pissy mood and down-vote you for whatever reason. =)
pobody's nerfect
Football players also make significantly more money... I'm sure Korean StarCraft players make 6 figures salaries in won (korean currency)
I would love to see what 4Chan would do with this
haha, looks like I fell for a troll on my first submit.  :(
pretty cool product for xmas
This book is an amazing read. The concepts are dense but Greene does a fantastic job of describing things in lay terms that almost anyone should get something out of the book as long as you're not already well versed in String Theory/M-Theory. 
IAMA MAM AMA
One in my house, the other on the opposite side of a TSA checkpoint. No pat downs for me.
Not a big fan Haft.  He can come off a bit pretentious sometimes, but I guess if I had his job I be a bit braggadocios too. Depending on how involved the process is I might be interested.  PM me.  
[Courtesy of Alton Brown](http://www.foodnetwork.com/recipes/alton-brown/eggnog-recipe2/index.html)
&gt;It wasn't an advocacy.  So you've spent all this time defending a figure you knew from the start was meaningless, and NOT a probability at all.  LOL!  I've never understood why people won't admit they were wrong, even after they've admitted they were wrong.   &gt;Sure, the figure is good to multiple decimal places, as long as the context is what the prices paid imply.  You mean like this...  I've found a simple fraction for pi  pi = 10/3  it's good to over a million decimal places. (*)  (*) as long as you don't compare it to actual circles.  This victory just keeps getting more fun.  Footnote for the satire-impaired: The stuff about pi above is **not** to be taken seriously, so don't bother 'correcting' my 'error'.
Fantastic idea, best of luck!  Have you checked out the Open Source Ecology project? They could be very very helpful to your cause.  http://openecology.org/
&gt;While I like the quote, I think it's in poor taste to try and turn him in to a spokesperson for atheism.  I post on another site devoted to people who fly privately. A year or so back someone posted a quote from a famous person who passed away talking about how much he enjoyed flying.  It would have been just as asinine for someone to have replied to that poster saying it was in poor taste to make the famous person a spokeman for flying as it would claiming the above is trying to make him a spokesman for atheism.   I'm genuinely interested when I find out someone famous that I respected and who made me laugh has some of the same views or passions as I do.  If everyone believed it was in poor taste I'd probably never find out about these things.  
I had that same poster on my wall when I was in 7th grade... I am ashamed but if I don't admit it I'll never move on.
i would get such a huge boner going 5 mph below the speed limit if you were behind me
"Remarkable continuity." haha
Williamsburg is a 10 min subway ride from Union Square, so easy to get to.  Spuyten Duyvil anyone? Great beer bar with good cheeses and meats to nibble on.  There's also Full Circle, a skee-ball bar, up the street from there.  And a bunch of other bars on Grand St.  Selfishly, this is all very close to my apartment, too, but the reason I live there is that it's a fun area. Let us know what you want to do!
I hate that.  It's a D not an A fools!
Also, it *never* bugs you about anything. I have not seen the interface for that program since I initially installed it, updated, and set the auto-update.
This makes me beary happy.
Want nice.... try Digg.com :)
Amtrak loses piles of money, yet they are going to invest millions of dollars in locked containers on all trains and staff to be able to monitor those containers? The Feds need to just clarify that unloaded and in a locked suitcase is just fine.
[+20 tshirt of smiting](http://www.thinkgeek.com/tshirts-apparel/unisex/gaming/7215/)  Approve
i don't want to ruin the coolness of my young self
That sounds completely reasonable.  If you saw concrete evidence (peer-reviewed, published paper, with pictures) that documented a significant number of data *collectors* artificially biasing the data towards the warm side...  ...would you be willing to concede that even the best science, with the best intentions, will still give bad results if the source data is bad?
&gt; How do I know? I hate to say it, but we dealt with this very site about a year ago on Digg.   I first saw this pic on reddit within a few months after joining Reddit.  Which was about three and a half years ago.
There's a cataclysm raid achievement called "Arrested Development"
Walmart.com was selling them earlier with two games. Picked one up for my brother.
I agree with all of that, and I do that too sometimes but from my experience, it's better to not use that as a form of judging someone's intelligence.  It's kind of judgmental, and whether you know it or not, makes you seem pretty arrogant.  
But those pixels are arranged in my favorite way.
Even if I print a blank word document, the page will have a header with my name and a footer with the date and time. Wasting time/energy/paper.  Learn how to troll bitch.
Turns out it was the naturally occurring morphine content all along...
Liar.  You sent me a friend request.  I turned it down because you touched my no no place that one time.
The cow is coming from... *inside* the house!
Jack Warner is such a cunt.
What does this have to do with the players? I'm not prepared to make any statements on how difficult it is to be a progamer or a player in the NFL. I just want to point out that that the level of coordination you're talking about seems to refer to general managers and not players.
Try https://www.nearlyfreespeech.net/
I came to say this only less clearly and without any acronyms. I would have probably clicked cancel instead of save anyway so thanks.
crack is bad, mmkay?
I feel terrible about what you folks are facing. Hang in there, keep the faith, and all that.
It was worth it.
Seriously, if people don't want to be hassled to show their receipt then they should realize they can shop elsewhere. It takes one second to show your receipt. Most times they don't inspect it. This whole scenario in the post just seems like a huge waste of time and energy. We all know what stores require this unconstitutional breach of privacy, and the only way to hurt them is to shop elsewhere. But if you do decide to shop at one of these locations, suck it up.   **tl;dr** You don't need to shop at Walmart.
If you ask good questions not covered in the FAQ section then you get good responses.  However the vast majority of people who go to r/atheism to "ask questions" are either thinly veiled trolls or people rehashing the same tired old questions that have been asked and answered a million times before.  There is only so many times that someone can be bothered to answer the same old deeply flawed/loaded questions before they grow tired and just downvote and or respond in a less than ideal manner.
None unless A) they fail and B) you have more than $250K in interest-bearing accounts there.  Otherwise, you're FDIC insured.  Oh, and it's all but impossible that anything he's got would make them fail.
She's never gonna give you up.
about 8 cups a day. 
I originally thought it was the sound of one hand clapping and was used in a sarcastic "ha ha" kind of way.
He deserves that contract.  He has been playing at pro bowl level all season.  Glad to know we'll have him for the next several years.
I once fucked an infinite loop.   We've been together for 900 years :(
Glad I'am not alone. 
&gt;When it comes to these games consoles have always received the shit end of the stick.  That we do. That we do. 
I do not know how he sits there and keeps his cool
Rob Ford ate our jokes!
Hah.  Her property is emitting a tremendous amount of radiation, in flagrant violation of FCC regulations.  [This guy](http://www.reddit.com/user/SpACE_lawyer) could probably help...
*They* love *our* city.
Oh drat, I was hoping firefox had some super cool command line tool for getting a url and parsing stuff out.  Oh well, funny nonetheless.
Doesn't take a Brainsturgeon to recognize spelling mistakes.   One of the few times spell-check has made things worse for me. Thanks for the copy-edit, buddy.
uptoke for knowledge
And Terran buildings should be able to crash into other buildings.
They're off the charts.
I'm from Peru, and it is also funny (everyone makes fun of them) because in Spanish, FAP stands for
Really?  I've always figured it was more Christmas tree-esque.  I've also been called an old man for preferring it at the ripe age of 19. What are some more old-timer liquors?  Just to perpetuate my image of course.
You might be able to defer parts of the more heavy template meta-programming topics, but you'll need the rest. And eventually, probably the template meta-programming too.
Sounds like you need to return to your roots.
Not wanting to make the indentation a nightmare, but i think it's an interesting thing to discuss. By having a branch integrator doing things, yes you get more testing and such, but for a small project (especially where all devs are on the payroll) i believe it slows things down.  For a small team (&lt;10 people) then i think it's  better to have a guideline of "Avoid breaking the tree, and if you do, fix it asap". The sooner code can get into the tree, the sooner it can be widespread tested. The other reason for forking from head rather than known good point, is that it avoids conflicting with code that's already in the tree. 
Ha, one of the only TBMs I know is a dentist.
What if the question is rhetorical.
come again?
Interventions and Lullabies - the Format.
There are definitely some hardcore religious folks here in America. There's a whole gradient of sane to insane people. My family wouldn't react too badly, but there are others who would.
**just because no one else has called you an ignorant cunt in bold yet, I will**  Protip: you are not in sole possession of The Truth The Scientists Dare Not Utter just because you saw a graph of the multi-decadal oscillation on wattsupwiththat.com or some other bullshit denialist website, m'kay?
ukulele no good
Is Hannity really Jewish or was that sarcasm from Grodin?
Pixelpipe will send photos and videos to any number of sites. You just pick which ones and upload away (multiple sites at once, in fact).
What colour is your hair? Brown!? OMG it must be that.  See, you had sex two fucking times, no pun intended. The first few times, you *will* suck at it (even if you think you do not, you'll later realize you did indeed suck). There's just too much tension, pressure to perform and uncertainty, plus you lack experience, don't always discover the comfortable ways to do it, might be out of shape, and focus on doing it right rather than enjoying what you do. There's a 99.9% chance that it's not soy.  This comes from a vegetarian who eats lots of soy-based products and:  - Has the sex drive of a bonobo - Grabs his vegetarian girlfriend and fucks her like a mad beast, even roars at it (no kidding), often leaving a pool of sweat on her chest; both love it - Still has time and desire to fap to porn - Sucked the first few times
The MPs
"Citations"
"Welcome to the desert of the real."   *-Morpheus*
I would totally watch Dragon Ball 2010.
I was hoping Wiki would have a little audio button. but it didn't.
I'd say it meets your comparative criteria then.  On the other hand, our politicians do pander to the xenophobic "keep the boat people (refugees) out" crowd. Still, we've got a number of Greens party members in now, who calm down the other parties and their racism.
[](/troll) should have got velcro man
http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/needful
retards.
Unless she's not, and he's into the cuckold aspect...
Even then, I didn't think it was bad. They were trying to get food, which reminded them both of their father, who probably died in the outbreak or something. I doubt the tears were because "We're such different people!" and the conversation was to keep from breaking down to, "I can't believe daddy's gone!"
you cant really tell a group of people not to pass around a simple list of numbers via the internet.
Those aren't hand made.
Only in America can you own one rifle (even if rather weak) and not consider yourself to be a gun owner 0_0  signed, a Canadian.
Insulting, eh?  This is the first comment to which I replied: "It's also important to remember that you can be nice to people without believing in crazy shit."  I've never said that self-interest is inherently in conflict with morality.  I've said that self-interest alone cannot be *normative* - you have no basis for enforcing values derived solely from self-interest upon others that don't see it your way.  The morality of self-interest is entirely self-referential - there is no appeal when someone says, "I don't feel like doing what you want" other, perhaps, than the application of force.  But there's a larger point here that is being missed.  One measure of any belief system (not the only one) is how internally consistent it is.  A theist saying, "I believe in a personal God and thus have a consequent set of moral norms to which we must all be held" is being consistent.  An atheist who says, "Morality is that which serves my &lt;fill in the blank&gt; desired utility and I wish to make it binding upon others" is being *inconsistent* with their own premises.  Why?  Because everyone's desired utility may not line up.  The strong may wish to oppress the weak, and other than disagreeing with them, there's no real resolution to the matter.  As to "evidence" ... there is no such thing absolutely for anyone.  What you hold to be "true" is always a consequence of your philosophical starting points.  "Proof" only exists narrowly in mathematics.  The "evidence" you claim is rooted in your unprovable assumption that the sense-reason process, when harnessed by the scientific method, is reliable.  But you cannot actually know this.  We could well be in The Matrix for all any of us actually knows.  So, in the end, what you "know" fundamentally hinges on what you *believe in the first place*.  To my mind, the complexity of the universe, the fact that anything exists at all, the inability of the sense-reason process to even speak to primary cause, and the lack of normative ethics in all other systems, strongly suggests that the universe had an author. You disagree, that's fine.  But don't kid yourself.  The rational-empiricist-materialist philosophy that dominates most atheist thinking and philosophy is NOT evidently superior to the alternatives.  It has provided us all with great utility value - technology, science, medicine, and so on -  but it fails miserably in answering those pesky questions that even atheists themselves ponder:  Why are we here?  From whence did we spring?  Is there meaning to any of this?  Does my life have a purpose?  It's interesting that Dawkins, after going through all of his anti-God ruminations -when confronted with the question of first cause - said something to the effect that the evident design in things like DNA might be attributable to aliens have seeded this part of the universe with our life forms (I watched him say it the other day on a show I was watching)!  Aliens?  He just punted.  He knows he can't answer the question because *his method, but its nature must remain silent on the matter*.  Only metaphysics can begin to address these issues.  The fact that it's really hard to do, isn't open to sense-reason inspection, has historically been sometimes abused, and so on, doesn't make the questions less important or make them go away.  Someone in this thread mentioned human 'nature' in their argument for a God-free ethical system.  I'd suggest the most fundamental and evident property of human nature is our need to find meaning in our lives.  No atheist philosophy can ever enable that.  In fact, it so cripples the discussion that you have to ... punt.
Should be "I dank da bongwadder"
Never cared much for N (blasphemy!) but I *love* everything Edmund McMillen does. The man deserves a place up there with Jonathan Blow.
fuck you
Carbon? Adamas? 
I am AWESOMEO.
Wikileaks will not be in the headlines by that point and cleared out of any politicians memories. 
Often, when I see people complaining that they have been treated unfairly it is actually the case that they have acted badly in the first place and are upset at the reaction they get to this. Now I don't know what your real account is, so i've no way of knowing whether this applies to you, but it's something to watch out for.
Oh yeah. That was pretty impressive, but not all that funny.
Mutalisks fly by sonic propulsion in space.
Great work on both pieces. Nothing feels better than creating something from scratch. 
Oh my god, someone made a not negative post about New Jersey. I can't count how many times at the rally afterparty my interactions started with "You are from NJ? I'm sorry"
[Swedish House Mafia - One (Your Name) [feat. Pharrell]](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PkQ5rEJaTmk)
If you did that to me id like to slam my fist in your face
I have no friends in college, and my hopes of transferring to a really great school after this semester went from pretty close to 100% to not happening.
Don't raid the bodies. This isn't Fallout 3. 
Theres is or maybe was, a very good local butchers in Christchurch Dorset UK, a small mall by St. Catherines hill, they made the most divine shop sausage rolls, various types such as slices of tomato in them under the pastry, bacon ones, the best was a lamb sausage with mint wrapped in pastry.   The most sad thing about MN, lamb is almost unknown, mutton is as rare as unicorn droppings (here and also the UK).
Understood, but conversely, if I'm already going 65 mph where the speed limit is 60 and I'm passing a guy on the right, don't come barraging down the lane I'm in expecting me to speed up. Don't go riding my ass til I pass him and move back into the right lane, I'm not going to speed up. And that's a bona fide way to piss me off and make me want to slow down in retaliation.  Seriously, where do you have to go where you're in such a rush, *home*? You really just can't wait those extra 10 seconds it's going to take me to pass? You're going to jeopardize both of our lives for a mere **10 seconds**? Well, my life is more valuable to me than that - heck, your life is more valuable to me than that.  Listen, I hate traffic as much as you do, but I'm stuck in it too and trying to maintain a safe speed and distance. So why don't we give each other the courtesy and civility needed for us both to *safely* travel to our destination.
Ironic buttsecks?  "I have a new STD, but you've probably never heard of it."
What are you trying to say?
Too long.
No words can describe this greek epic....
Gold/5 items are decent if you already intended to get an item that they build into. This only applies if you keep the item as long as you can. That way, you are not selling it, thus only benefiting from its passive.  Otherwise they're worth exactly as you've summarized.
Oh shi- that's a woman...
no it sair r/trees before. in awesome greenish weed letters.
Why isn't Huckabee calling for the prosecution of those who leaked the identity of a CIA agent, and the prosecution of those responsible for torturing prisoners in US custody?
Move to Bangor Wat. Shave your head and eat only monkey flesh. He'll find you.
Mastodon isn't bad, but all albums? Or even 'entry level'? There are far better metal acts out there...
Greetings,  With all that is happening in our world, it is time for us to choose the proper fork in the road and take the responsibility to create a better future for generations to come. The way that we are going to accomplish this is for each of us to shift his and her perception of the manner in which we perceive the reality of events that surround us. We have been conditioned by elements outside ourselves, to believe that we must submit to certain belief systems in order to accomplish joy and prosperity.  Joy and prosperity are not accomplished by listening to others telling us what we should believe. They are accomplished by seeking knowledge within our true self. True self is that part of us all that we had as children, the natural instincts that guided us to those things that felt natural to us, without someone telling us that we should not. True, suppressed instincts cause us to lose sight of our destiny, what each of us was put on this planet to accomplish. This is why so many people are unhappy with their lives. Constant changes in social structure creates a false state of self perception, causing people to seek unrealistic ventures that are not suited for their natural instincts.  Only when we seek out and trust our true self is when we can place ourselves into a groove that allows the forces of Nature to act in our favor. Situations and circumstances that we encounter on a moment-to-moment basis will produce a "domino effect" of events that will appear magical-like and amplify our confidence in the path that we have chosen. There are frequencies in this universe that when locked into will provide joy and prosperity by Divine Decree.  Begin your ascension to higher consciousness, and achieve more popularity, love and understanding. 21st Century Jedi: Spiritual Athletes on the Cosmic Chessboard.   Amazon.com
I've been here 3 years. I figured I'd have made a friend on here in that time. I'm sure it's my fault not trying too hard, but Yea not one. Paltalk and other chat sites though I've met really cool funny humble people. I thought that's what this was going to be like. But not really. So I hoped for Reddit to start a live chatroom, but I tried that IRC, and they are pretty nerdcore catty smug fucks much of the time. 
Narnia.
You have ruined it by posting this in a public forum.  If the Palin camp discovers it, the family will go after her, and whatever information she *might* have will be lost forever, to someone who may be able to use it for the better.  
&gt;Almost all of the presidents can be characterized as Christian, at least by formal membership.  Anything else is speculation. They at least mainly self-identified as Christians.  &gt;Your argument is that a person can be a Christian without following Christian morals. He cannot because to be a Christian means following Christian morals.  This is an interesting definition, but I don't agree. For example, Merriam-Webster's gives its first definition of a Christian as "one who professes belief in the teachings of Jesus Christ." None of the definitions pertain to following a Christian moral code. I understand that the dictionary may not be your preferred source on this topic, but most definitions I have encountered similarly say being a Christian is about faith in Jesus.
have you tried saving the image you want to set as the wallpaper then viewing it in the folder and right clicking the file itself to change it? 
&gt;They might be ugly, dumb, smell like shit, and shoot like Michael J. Fox all hopped up on crystal meth, but they're some determined motherfuckers.  Was this in reference to the Taliban, our soldiers, or both?
The problem is not the age difference, it is the IQ gap
i bet they grew up with both parents present, dad makes most of the money, while mom sleeps arounds with the men around the neighborhood. they go to church though, you know, to show their god how much they live by his rules, doesn't make a difference, moms still banging half the block. back to your "friends", they once got super wasted off some shitty booze one time at church camp and they now feel that getting blazed is not acceptable because they do not have the ability to handle that state of mind. just realized i don't know where I was going with this , maybe you just opened up some hidden memories. ha oh man thats some good bud  TLDR: Fuck 'em [6]
I'll relate my personal story, though comparatively it's not *that* bad.  I grew up in a small, southern Missouri town full of Pentecostals and Southern Baptists. The world was 6000 years old and even that was a stretch of the local imagination. When I came out in my high school, I had never heard the word "atheist" spoken before. I found it in a dictionary under "Agnostic: See Atheist."  People called me a devil worshiper. I lost friends over it. I had people try to get into fights with me because they were offended that I thought they were "evolved from monkeys". I was harassed in one form or another by quite a few people. There were a multitude of tactics. I graduated and joined the military and managed to get out of there but later on I started a blog and managed to receive a few death threats because of it as well. While being an atheist in America isn't always life threatening, it can be dangerous to live freely.  My dad angrily told me it was just a phase 10 years ago. This year he came out to me as an atheist as well. :)
these comments are gold.
I think not, what with retards being unable to read and all.
yes, and it was like fucking herpes on my computer. was never able to get rid of the drivers for that thing and it kept trying to do stuff even without it plugged in &gt;:[
post anything at all in /r/trees. dopers will blindly upvote to feel like they're part of some kind of community.
## 
Considering that all of Comcast's advertising for internet boils down to "Use us for internet because we are better than AT&amp;T's internet", I'd say that they are directly competing with each other.   The same is true for their television service.  Their advertisements don't say "go with us for cable because we are the only game in town", they say "go with comcast because its better than direct tv".  As a technical person, the actual implementation likely matters to you, but most consumers don't know anything about the implementation.  They are buying a product, ie: internet access or subscription television, the delivery mechanism doesn't matter. 
please, make a tape raid array, chain a dozen together and use that whole megabyte of storage to it's fullest potential!  ASCII PRON!
Yes! I had a dream where I sat on a scorpion and it hurt more than a beesting :(
Seams are sewn into the middle, therefore they tend to stay in the middle, especially when my bits also have a crease down the middle.  The seam of tight pants always tends to rest on the crease of me in my experience.  I do know that when I stand upright, my outer labia doesn't look like it's fused to my thigh though.  Her's does.
http://imgur.com/dFJkz [](/troll)
I argue against men taking it upon themselves to claim they have a "right" to lead.  I argue against sexism because we are both (male and female) in need of a Savior.  I argue in favor of trusting female leadership because women have as much to offer in terms of grace as men have in terms of humility.  If you mean "word for word", literally, then I'd be happy to see where I have done so.  Otherwise I shall have to assume you mean that only as a figure of speech.  As for Adam's leadership, what could he have done, assuming he did not also sin?  Could he have "forgiven" Eve?  Not hardly, unless he gave himself up for her (and then, only maybe, since we have no "theology" on that). Suppose Adam, in the end, could have saved Eve (as Christ saved us all).  That is not "leadership", it is *servanthood*, as it was modeled when Christ Himself said:  &gt;If anyone would be first, he must be last of all and servant of all.  Christ honors the man who serves, not leads, his wife.  That can mean many things, but in the least, the argument should be about how a man can *serve* with greater "authority", not lead.  Moses was supposed to *speak* to the rock, not strike it the second time.  The disciples were supposed to make straight the path (via Samaria) to Jerusalem, not call fire down to destroy them.
He made a few self deprecating jokes making fun of people who talk about art. If you're afraid of coming off as a butthurt artist, you better grow a thicker skin.  That guy humorously gave a simple definition and many cogent examples of a term that tends to be used nebulously. Now we're all on the same page and we can use the term correctly furthering intellectual discussion.
I got fired from my job in July (nurse at a local hospital). I decided to take it easy for a while, cashed in my $7,000 401k to make ends meet for a couple months. I put in some applications here and there which didn't amount to much. My GF began getting tired of seeing me every day and demanded I get a job. She said she was "tired of taking care of me" (making it sound like I was bedridden and she had to wipe my ass all day- despite that during this time I did *all* the cleaning and most of the cooking every day).  I finally ended up getting a travel nursing job in St. Louis for 11 weeks. I started on Nov. 1st and when I left, things were looking better. She was starting to say "I love you" again, referring to herself as my "girlfriend" (she had earlier told me we were done, but might be able to work things out) and we had some steamy conversations on the phone from time to time. One night, after this such behavior, I asked if this meant we were "together" again. This question flipped some kind of switch in her head. She became instantly angry and never recovered.  I've been here a month now and I just got off the phone with her 10 minutes ago and we decided it's definitely not going to work out. We had just bought a house together and now I have to figure out how to get it into her name, and manage to land a job when I get back and find a place to live.  I know no one here and I'm feeling intensely alone.
I thought it ended up being overturned in court and Lincoln refused to comply.  Regardless, Lincoln was a scumbag who did all kinds of illegal things to anti-war protesters.
someone make a post and link to it! Although I am turning 22 and having a bday pub crawl the friday of finals week(17th?) if anyone is down. I would love for the internet to come to my pub crawl :)
It's about him tripping balls on DMT. I think him forgetting his pen in the trip and not remembering the message is funny. Of course there is the figurative ways you can take song, I was just commenting on the face value.
Yes, you've restated my point admirably.  A true statement of opinion is not considered defamation.   My point went on from there to say that merely appending "in my opinion" to the beginning of a sentence is not a magic potion.  If it's defamatory to say "bastardoperator stole my bike!," it is also defamatory to say "in my opinion, bastardoperator stole my bike!"  The damage to your reputation doesn't magically go away because it's just, like, my opinion, man. If I make a statement that I know to be false and it harms the reputation of another, I may have defamed them, whether or not I use weasel words like "in my opinion" or "some people say." Signed,  a lawyer who has tried defamation cases  (standard disclaimer this is not legal advice I am not licensed to practice in your jurisdiction do not rely on any statements made herein when choosing a course of action only a jackwagon gets legal advice from an anonymous internet guy) 
If it is a scam, you need to find her and exact harsh revenge. ;)
I listed my reddit comment karma, and used reddit on a reference for the job I got. It's better paying than a lot of people make locally, and I have almost unlimited hours available(the people who make more don't). True story.
I'm with you. I love the links that I find on here, but I avoid commenting most of the time (only registered an account very recently to upvote something) because of the consistent flaming I saw of users when I didn't have an account.  Reddit has a lot of great stuff on it, but a huge number of people participating in the discussion are condescending or refuse to accept views other than their own. There are great exceptions, but most threads turn away from intellectual discussion of two view points and into a discussion of why someone must be wrong and how stupid their viewpoint is.  It also very often takes on a hivemind mentality with regards to an opinion. As soon as a certain opinion on a topic gains critical mass, all other opinions will be shut down.
Viola was my great aunt's name
I am so glad I live in a totally secular society, and that Atheists run it.
Thanks to massive loans from China..
Thank you for speaking sense, it seems that once a nation becomes an enemy, it is the duty of us as citizens to unearth and reinforce every single negative fact about these people in order to rationalise their probable slaughter.  War is completely and utterly immoral and it'ss group think like this that allows maliciously stupid people to wage pointless wars for personal gains.  You and I and anyone on Reddit have absolutely nothing to gain in a war with North Korea, there are no captives to liberate or oppressed masses to bring democracy to, a hostile external revolution would exterminate the better part of an entire generation of North Koreans and bring only pain and fear to their children.
http://dallas.craigslist.org/tix/
I was very intense about it. I had a paperclip and a screwdriver just in case the coins would get caught in the coin return slot...basically a whole lockpick set.
No Noam, it shows that SOME of the ruling elite think that.  Not the American people. Not the British people. Not any Western democracy's people. I am actually sick of this guy telling me that I'm a fucking sheep and we're all fucking doomed because we just don't care about democracy, and we're far too stupid to notice the powers that be controlling us.  I'm fully expecting this to get downvoted to hell because reddit loves this guy but quite frankly I don't care. He makes some good points but he's a cynical twat most of the time.
we gonna fiiind you
They're in a rush. It's to emphasize that cereal is a quick and easy breakfast.
Sooo freaking cool!!!  i hope it's meeee!
Or any kind of spirituality. Mistake numero uno for moi.
Do you tell random strangers to Fuck off? Do you treat all the people you interact with daily the way you treat your brother? No? Why not? Don't they need to just grow a thicker skin?  Or maybe it's because you fear social consequences of acting like a douchebag in public, but there are no consequences to being an anonymous douchebag.
yes very much so
It says in the post, under Tanks, that the some tanks tend to think that the group can't function without them. It's strange, because I recently queued for a random on my warrior, and a pair of druids from Firetree, (one was Resto, the other Balance) started pulling the mobs and killing them before I had even put Vigilance up. WTB Mobs that 1 shot non-tanks.
I don't know if anyone will ever get this, but I received the Cycbot.b backdoor today, around 1130 EST. Wherever this came from, it could still be attacking and infecting
Dude.  You're a sniper.  You aren't supposed to be mobile and running around a map capping points.  You're supposed to be picking off the enemy as they run by and looking at a point and shooting the bastards that are trying to take it.  I snipe alot and employ the same strategy.  It's a camping class imo, and in CoDBO it's been doubly enforced as such because it's near impossible to run around just a pistol and quickscoping is gone. If you are sitting in a corner ADS with an Assault Rifle at a door however, I hate you. :)
Ha ha HA!   Why would a horse be in such an establishment?!
FIND A WAY GOD DAMNIT
sNap!
Why don't you stop being an asshole?
Circular logic, huh.  Seems similar to a system that only allows votes from those who agree with the policies already in place... hrmm... where have we seen that before?
Surprise, surprise, a good portion of Glenn Beck's anti-government screed comes directly from a book called 'The 5,000 Year Leap' written by a once prominent Mormon named W. Cleon Skousen. A like minded conspiracy theorist of similar religious background.  If you still didn't think Glenn Beck was using his position on Fox to proselytize, even after his rally, this should be something of a wake up call.
I applaud you, and am glad you made it out of that ordeal alive. My condolences to the dog's ass, btw.   In any case, this problem is getting out of hand. There are far too many stray children loose. It may be morally frowned upon, but when I see a child in the middle of the road while I'm driving, I hit it.
They are the worst, there is also an Avon woman who stalks a coworker of mine around wells and Washington, creepy.
Goddammit, you're [right](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brassiere_measurement#Cup_volume_relative_to_band_size).
Thank you so much!
[But a hilarious recipe!](http://askaninja.com/node/4396)
Can you hardboil an egg in a fryer?
Or [r/soccer](http://www.reddit.com/r/soccer/)   Its understandable its an awesome sport and I'm a European who gets really into American football when the Superbowl is on and want to keep watching after its over so I can sort of relate to you. 
If I were you I wouldn't suggest to the people of Texas they should be ashamed of anything.  Why should an entire state be shameful of the comments of one, misinformed man?  Be Proud to be a Texan. Be upset that this moron represents anyone. 
I fuckin loled. all my friends worked at movie theaters growing up.  
It comes and goes like waves...
Bad move on the Justin Bieber look.
Cool. I can't wait to try it out. I've got a fairly beefed up BMW I'll be using in the beginning. Oddly enough, I also purchased the 98 civic. Lol I was starting to feel bad for my ai driver until I bought the BMW. 
